404 Error: Costume Not Found Written in sharpie marker on a white shirt in an attempt at Times New Roman at 24 pt. A cowboy hat just so people at parties don't give me a problem.
I mentioned this earlier. http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/9zre2/i_am_a_former_iv_heroin_addict_ama/c0f6kzh  To answer your questions though... Yes, I had it. I overdosed several times on it. I lost track how many times. An OD doesn't necessarily require narcan... I've been resuscitated several times from OD'ing, though.   The reason it was dropping people is due to its potency, microgram range(a grain of salt is a few 100 micrograms), and because whoever was distributing it wasn't cutting it right. You do need some skill when we're talking about cutting with microgram doses vs milligram doses. I know of at least 2 people that died. I wasn't close to them.  How do you judge potency? For something like fentanyl you can't. Fucked up, ain't it? For heroin, you snort some to test its potency. Easiest way is to figure out your intranasal dose, and shoot half of that, as the BA for intranasal heroin is roughly 50% and for intravenous heroin it's 100%.
Ouch! that hurt!
Oh, absolutely!  I'm a total admirer of "The King's English" (with a nod to her Majesty, of course).  And it seems like even British schoolchildren are eloquent compared to most adult Americans such as me.  (It *is* "such as me," right? "As" being a preposition(?) takes the object pronoun...  British kids probably know the answer!)
He died the same day he was born? Holy shit is he some kind of half-existent paradox man?
it's up up down down left right left right b a start.  The key is finding the controller.
Only about [this](http://psychology.wikia.com/wiki/Medical_student_syndrome)
If you want to get an image that looks exactly like what your eye saw at the time you need a full HDR exposure and an HDR display. Short of that you can try tonemapping a full HDR exposure, but this technique of tonemapping a single raw is not legitimate for matching exactly what your eye saw.
I've never quite figured out Google's interface. I just wait for the lmgtfy links.
That was originally from Warcraft I actually.
I agree with much of what you've said here, but need to point out, that the battlefield series may not see that PC success for much longer, it's being heavily console-ified, first BF:Heroes drops to only 3 basic classes, and BF:1943 follows, I don't imagine BF:BC2 will be any deeper on the PC either.
What is your favorite area in the Bahamas?  I was on Man O War last year; really liked the area. My parents have been threatening to retire out that way.
I googled ZomboCom and laughed my balls off. Thank you.
Hmmm, aren't companies trying to trim down their debts using their surplus?  Looks like a sound move to me. 
Not in the mindset to think about other people's problems.
You know what? I get that. And I was going to write you something, but then I wrote like a wall of text. You don't need my rambling, but I can tell you what I try whenever I get to the shitty depths of miserable despair.   Whatever you're feeling is gonna pass. BUT This is war, it's you against your mind and your mind has taken you prisoner and is torturing you. The object is to survive, do whatever you need to get through the next few hours. Distract yourself with shitty tv, if you can...try sleeping or eating junk food, something, anything.   Whatever acute feeling you're having is gonna pass, it's like quitting smoking, your brain just fucking with you now.   Don't give in. It is going to pass. If you have to, get angry. Smash a plate in the sink, crush some eggs with your hands. Scream, pound the wall with your fist. Talk to someone.   Change something: If you're sitting, lie down. If you're lying down, get up. Pace around the room, focus on your breath. Whatever, just get through the next 15 minutes, the next hour. Whatever you are feeling is gonna pass. 
Just as our founding fathers intended, no doubt. :/  Not that you're technically wrong or anything, but clearly our founders had a vision of limited government and vast personal liberties (they even explicitly stated so), and playing semantic gymnastics to subvert that core vision is simply sophistry, no matter how you try to justify it.
It's not completely made out of liquid metal. It has a chip in there somewhere.  But yeah, for the sarah conner chronicles to claim you have to cover non-organic with organics to slip them through, without invalidating Terminator 2, is ridiculous.  Packmath gets it right.  Apparently metaphors count.
Hey DSLJohn, it's cool you're trying to keep the discussion civilized and imma let you finish, but [Jesus Fucking Christ](http://www.burbuja.info/inmobiliaria/members/traficante-albums-imagenes-picture393-jesus-fucking-christ.jpg) is one of the best /r/atheism memes of all time.  OF ALL TIME!
I've heard it said that Catholics believe too much while protestants believe too little.  Seems pretty accurate.
What a ripoff. You guys should have kept it and written your own paper on it.
Family values is the other one. Every nutbag gay hating group seems to have "family" in the title, as if gay people didn't belong to families too.
Those inanely long cutscenes before really hard bosses? They need to be unskippable.  Basically, you described all JRPGs; and the reason(s) why I will never play them (again).
We have [huge amounts](http://www.nytimes.com/2009/06/18/business/energy-environment/18gas.html) of the stuff too.
&gt;Convert's many followers.  FTFY   Zombie bites render people mindless, but that doesn't make them mindless to begin with. Christianity is debatable.
Hell yes! The longer it had been, the more it would 'degauss'.  And it wasn't as satisfying if it only 'degaussed' a little.  (Did that even serve a purpose?)
So crispy it's borderline "burnt". okay, sometimes "burnt". That's how I roll...
I have to say, I'm not impressed.
Great stuff. I actually laughed out loud. That's a fucking rarity.
Well first off, pick up the free weekly called the Chronicle. It's going to have listings of bands playing, reviews of various restaurants, volunteer opportunitites, ads for multi-beer venues, etc...  Half-Price books (new and used) and Book People are a couple of good book stores. The Gingerman has a huge selection of beer but isn't the only place that does.  I second the Spider House. It's a good way to meet Austin.  Where are you coming from? What part of Austin are you moving to?
Why wouldn't you be allowed to fuck, as a human?
The one where they bitched about 90% piracy (the rate it's always been) or the $100,000 in 1 week ?
It is a source of some minor frustration.  I have exactly the same feeling--it is basically a message that I don't belong.  That being said, it isn't exactly a burning issue for me.  I think we atheists have to pick our battles.
What's the distinction that lets you tell again?  (not the name)
In case anyone was wondering what OCD looks like ; )
WHAT SICK MAN SENDS BABIES TO FIGHT ME?
This is going to entertain me for the evening.  Thanks a bundle.
He looks out of place. Either way oversharpened, or shopped onto the background, or some selective blurring. Something along those lines. 
So... if I get drunk and fuck a 14yo, she should be in trouble too?
all islands and all gigs are unique.  in our case, we get two one-week periods, and one four-week vacation.  however, frankly, we've rarely ever needed the two one-week vacations, as we get most time off we want with the periodic stateside provisioning trips.  the month is for us to get the phuk WAY outta here (france, brazil, and such)
i envy you. i wish i could play deus ex for the first time (again).
a long list indeed!
I think the writer shows great insight and thought.
I remember polls from aol news during the election. They had every state for John McCain every time.
Where is this?
Left and right every time, N,S,E,W, or port/starboard - never. Why dat?
Feel free to downvote for mentioning Christ, but he actually weighs in on this topic... and he's got a pretty strong opinion about it.  "When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his throne in heavenly glory. All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left.  "Then the King will say to those on his right, 'Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.'  "Then the righteous will answer him, 'Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?'   "The King will reply, 'I tell you the truth, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers of mine, you did for me.'   "Then he will say to those on his left, 'Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.'   "They also will answer, 'Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?'   "He will reply, 'I tell you the truth, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.'   "Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life."  (from Matthew chapter 25)   The point- chaseoc set the pace of how we all need to behave towards those in need... and we christians will be held accountable for our actions.  
Up arrow. The remake for the gameboy advance was lacking.
Removing a virus infection surely is a difficult job. Anti-virus software can be very helpful, removing most of viruses easily. But sometimes, your computer may get infected with a really annoying virus which will not be removed with ease. Well, is it a dead end?
Are there any ISP's that don't do it...?
I'm getting a B.A. in C.S. too, because I switched majors a bit late.  People are asshats.
not without feeling guilty
She has a knife and looks ready to use it
I won't disagree with you that a lighter sentence seems like it might have made sense. But that's sort of my point - no one here is the fact finder. No one heard all the information and saw her in the courtroom. It's a logical fallacy that we are willing to stereotype someone (like this judge) rather than admit we might not be in possession of all the facts.   Especially when the crime was murder, I do not consider it AUTOMATICALLY improper that life sentences are imposed.
Diiiispensin' an erection! - Random guy on TF2
Call BS on whatever you'd like: I've got nothing to prove to you.
You think I could go through the weaver to get a carbon fiber suit of armor?
&gt;Also, sad to say, most persecution of Christians by Christians is perpetuated by the Orthodox.  Are you sure about this? Historically, the Orthodox Church has been the most persecuted of all the churches.
I have heard statistics that if American Christians just tithed 10% instead of about the 3% we do now, we could end world poverty and hunger.  I think your claim is false.
Shenmue. The third game will never come out. :(
Thank you!
I am so happy by that news. In Japan they have closed courts and the convicted doesn't even know he's going to die until 1/2 hour before it happens. It's a secretive and terrible judicial system
That... That is fucking awesome.
Just as planned...
I saw my first horror movie when I was 3 years old:  the Disney vesion of Pinocchio. It had weredonkeys, evil talking animals, living dolls and a gigantic ocean monster that would eat your dad whole.
Comfortably rich?  Speak for yourself!  ;)  Or give me some money, if you really are a generous gentleman.
! Those are! A lot! Of questions!
This happened to me once, I thought they were going to kidnap me or something.
This sounds like it needs a dark room, big leather chairs, drapes, candles and a whole lotta wine and dope. Nice!!
Not right now shes not
Harm can come as property loss as well.  I do.  
AWww, it's so kitsch it kinda makes me wanna have a baby. Well, nah, fuck that. But damn this is so bad taste :P 
This happens when the pop-up is closed, or you attempt to close it.
+1  goto is great for error unwinding and a standard, straightforward idiom. The alternative is a stack of `if`s which is much harder to read.
idkfa :D
Is *that* why there's a Linux version of avast? O_o Look, Linux is excellent - no arguments there - but let's be frank here... the affinity to vulnerabilities aside, Windows is a good OS.  I have never had serious problems with viruses, adware and the like by ensuring I install Spybot S&amp;D, avast!, Spywareblaster, and using Firefox with all the relative addons in place.
So you will ignore wars, the major paradigm shifters in civilization. Such a good educator you'll be...  Ignore WW2 and it'll be impossible to understand late 20th century society and politics; ignore the Second Roman Civil War and it will be impossible to understand the fall of the Republican Rome and the rise of the Imperial Rome, and with it, the basis of Western Society. 
What's wrong with your 'I'?
Thank you!
Even a peanut butter and dorito sandwich?
Glass is best.  Hands down.  You say you like an old-man style, well wooden pipes are totally old-man lol. I would suggest finding a nice piece in the $100-$200 range.  You can find very very nice glass for that price, and I probably wouldnt pay much over that - unless it was a bong or bubbler.  Hand pipes shouldnt be too much money.  
Well, I tend to like the faster ones, but among his slower and more meditative pieces I tend to like his solo piano pieces, especially his Metamorphosis pieces, which are really quite beautiful.   Heres the first one: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=il4VDf-ugPI  The Kronos Quartet does a bunch of his string quartets, which are great, and have a mix of brooding and fast bits. 
Pourquoi voulez-vous être riche ? quelle question vous vous dites, mais avez vous une réponse ? une bonne réponse précise et clair ?
Have you considered writing about your experiences in a screenplay or novel?  You could probably do a pretty good John Grisham-style story. 
How can you disparage me? By saying I'm too rational?  Ya, that really hurts my feewings.
Awesome. Your workflows look just like mine basically. I script out my mundane tasks all the time. 
Agreed. I clicked the comments-button hoping someone would have posted an alternate link.  edit: http://www.flickr.com/photos/shannonlayden/sets/72157622580240109/ http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/9zrur/seattle_overrun_by_prohealth_care_zombies_during/
Just because he's crying doesn't mean he isn't resilient. But at the same time, the point was that a kid isn't prepared to fire off a bunch of rounds at a piece of paper, much less real people, just from playing some video games. Kids have a pretty vivid grip on reality (its simply the actual experiences they tend to lack) and they can easily get emotional from coming face to face to something genuinely scary for the first time.
I'm all for correcting improper grammar.  The combination of capital letters, usage of bold font, and repetition of the admonition is just plain bitchy.
TAKE THAT, atheism!!!
Nice try, HOA.
My steam ID is Nipper012 and I will add you. Thanks!
Finder? :P
The show has had it in for her ever since her ['difficult' appearance](http://www.dailymotion.com/video/xa06zw_lady-gaga-on-jonathan-ross-full-int_fun)
The hand coming up from the bottom of the mask irks me. Otherwise it's ok. Whose face is it?
 mike@hyperion:~&gt; for i in Os O2; gcc -$i -Q --help=opt &gt; $i; diff -u Os O2  --- Os  2009-10-31 17:00:00.000000000 -0700  +++ O2  2009-10-31 17:00:00.000000000 -0700  @@ -46,7 +46,7 @@  -fhandle-exceptions     -fif-conversion       [enabled]  -fif-conversion2      [enabled]  -  -finline-functions       [enabled]  +  -finline-functions       [disabled]  -finline-functions-called-once    [enabled]  -finline-small-functions    [enabled]  -fipa-cp        [enabled]  This is for gcc 4.4.2.
That's not what mens rea is. Regardless, if she had no true sense of right and wrong then she should have pleaded insanity. That she didn't tells me she probably did. And if she did, then murder is NOT ok. She doesn't get to decide when to take a life.
Why not. :-)  Send me your address, please.
I don't know what's hotter, you or that fine book by Mr. Sagan you're reading.
It is actually... he's a JMT affiliate and a member of AOTP, so--   I mean... *meh*.
Great comment, and probably the most important I've read about this so far.  You have to exist within yourself, determine your own worth, love yourself.  Someone's going to see that in you and will be hooked.
Watching a DVD may not be legal either. Though, IANAL and I only know about the US.  Decrypting a DVD (e.g. using libdvdcss) without having paid the licensing fee constitutes an illegal act, according to the Digital Millenium Copyright Act.
ummm the GBA emulators came out like a month after the GBA was released, something about their chipset being cribbed from a palm pilot line
I see, you're right.
that one made such an impact that people are carving pumpkins about it.
     _,--''--,_  _,-'~~'-,     (    ''  {}{}    }{      {}{}   }{|       {}{}  }{}(   )   ,__    , \   {}{}  {}{)  / \' )  '\ / ~/\  (\/)  {}{/ /   \ | |  /| /  \   }{  }{( ) ( ) ( ) ( )  |   |}  {}{\\  \\ (/  ||   |  u|{  }{}{\\  \\   ||  || \  |    |\  |\  |\  |\  (\o  -- '' -'-'  ~` ""  ~`  ~`' ~` '"' "' -- '' -'-'
I sometimes use ggVG= in vim to indent everything.
&gt; Besides, most of the people in these countries support the death penalty.  Most of the people in these countries probably support segregation in one form or another as well, and i'd say people in most of those countries support women having lower statuses than men.
Lemme ask my housemates how they get me to clean up after myself, and then I'll get back to you.
Vote this up so others can learn from it.
I think there's a law that states the Secret Service decides who lives and who dies anywhere near the President? 
Many people claim not to like lamb but have never had a well-cooked piece of lamb. Here are two great ways to cook lamb that smells good, tastes good and has great texture.
Let me explain the joke:  Trick or treat = do something I want or I will do something mean to you.  Hence, it parallels a terrorist's mentality of threatening violence.  Bush often would not enter in *any* talks with enemy foreign powers because he viewed it as weakness. On the flip side, Obama was criticized during debates for suggesting he might talk with North Korea. These are examples of why the right/left might be associated with not negotiating/suggesting to negotiate with foreign entities which might be called 'terrorists'.   There is no reference at all to bank bailouts between the lines for PixelRobot's joke. Plus:  **it's a joke**.  Get over yourself.
I'm glad that you tried.  Even if you were unsuccessful, it's a lot better than letting it slide. For those that find themselves in a similar situation, try contacting: * A provincial/city ombudsman.  They are supposed to oversee such complaints.  * A news organization. Personally, talking to an investigative journalist would be best.  Get them to keep your name out of it and let them do the research; massively inflated contracts with bribes is a good news story.  Especially since it's likely that this happened before.
The guys at 3M lost a *Got Glue?* campaign right there.
I'll take neither - the former being weasel-wordy bullshit, and the latter quite unlikely. If you honestly believe "fostering internationalism" is all he and his cronies have been up to all these years, you're blind.   Have you ever seen the Rockefeller center? These people believe themselves Gods, above the common man, and they put it right out there (rather cleverly) in the architecture of their buildings and monuments which they erect. If you study the symbolism, you'd see a deeper, darker sort of force driving the ambitions of elites like Rockefeller.
Thanks. Your address, please.
I made these you need a thick bacon to taste it but it is good
Where people from reddit in a geographical location go somewhere and meet, like at a park, or somewhere, mainly to talk and be awkward.
I really wish I'd gotten that advice before becoming President.
You're ok as long as it doesn't start climbing up the wall.
http://tinyurl.com/b28d34 here you go
One man's troll is another man's foil. I get accused of trolling all the time, when instead I care more about saying what I believe instead of karmawhoring.  Every once in a great while, the karma comes, but usually i get a positive or a negative point, and that's just fine.
[The car](http://automobiles.honda.com/civic-gx/).
Sorry! I must've tied it up listening to that Cartman version of Pokerface one too many times.
Oh no, the Japanese have mastered the Ancient Redneck technologies of antiquity!
Oh, I'm very thankful of it. She is a cunt for not telling me sooner.
&gt;The presumption is that a friend is worth reading, while everyone else lives or dies by their comments.  Very well said.
She "worked hard" (snicker) at those things because she's an attention whore.  Back to the original point, Paris Hilton is just an example that provides a good punch line.  Probably more useful for the discussion is the fact that most "haves" did not come from Appalachia, the backwaters of Mississippi, or a government project in Chicago, starting with nothing.  The vast majority had tremendous advantage provided to them by the family they happened to be born to.  That could range from a billion dollar trust fund to just a stable home and college paid for.  Its a total outrage when the right tries to paint the majority of poor people as lazy.  Particularly when the working poor typically bust their ass much more than us "hard working" keyboard jockeys.  I've always thought if the Right is so into fair level playing fields where everyone has to succeed on their own merit, they should enact a 100% estate tax.  
&gt;nowhere during those 3 minutes was there any maths involved  Right. Except for the part where he says explicitly "Skipping math problem that shows 1=2. I mean clearly there wasn't any math there.  I'm just saying that I'm a senior in high school and I've drudged through hours of lecture classes and i've hopped and skipped through interactive/passionate classes like this one, and gotten Cs and As in them, respectively, and that you can have an exciting class that still has it's balance of work in it.
Do you also love paying less for food because your server can legally be paid half of minimum wage because you are expected to make up the difference with a performance based reward?
Just tried to submit this and found you here. Glad to see there's others out here that appreciate this song.  Beautiful.
I will give this a try! Thank you!
Hah, just saw Trainspotting a few hours ago. I've never really heard a lot of description on what it actually does to you (the high). What does it feel like?
No.
Is this thread living up to your expectations?  I thought there's be some interesting stuff here.
Okay, where do I start?  I'm only taking the time here and I mean 'time' because I now can only type with one finger and only use my thumb to click on the mouse to hopefully prevent another hydroplaning accident. I was driving a front wheel drive '93 Saab on 295N out of Portland, Me. on my way to Auburn on a Sunday eve, just after dark in a heavy rainstorm coming back from a Maine Ballroom  dance lesson.  I had been dancing for approx. 3 yrs (after my divorce to meet women away from the bars &amp; web dating) and I was just starting not to embarass myself on the floor and starting to receive a few compliments.  It was more challenging than I anticipated being a skier, tennis player, runner and a 3times/wk at Planet Fitness.  Yeah, I was in shape and proud of it since I was behind a computer all day, desk jocky CAD designer. My Saab lifted up and like on black ice I had no control. The rear end started to drift to the right being hydroplaned from the tire ruts and when the car finally cam down in a somewhat 45 deg. angle it resumed the road friction, fish tailed uncontrollaby, rolled over numerous times, shot across the grass median strip into oncoming South bound traffic.  My car was immediately in the front of a station wagon.  He never had time to touch the brake. He t-boned me 6in. behind the driver's side.  I bounced off from him and landed back in the center grass median strip.   Both cars were totaled.  The safety features in both cars did their job.  The couple in the Mercedes wagon walked away.  I was the only person in my car, thankfully.  But I wasn't so lucky.  But I'm alive. With my car on the center median strip with airbag released and still conscious, my head was lying on my chest.  With both hands I picked up my head to hold it in place.  Then I heard a man's voice asking me if I was alright.  I sad no I have a severe neck injury please, don't move me.  He could see I was starting to fade in and out so he reached in and helped me hold my head until the EMT's came.  To this day, now 3 yrs. ago I have no idea who this good Samaritan is.  My spinal cord injury is on the C6/C7 (complete) lower neck just before the thorasic region starts.  I'm not classified as a paraplegic nor a quadraplegic, but a tetraplegic.  I'm paralised from the breast down.  I can move both arms, limited grip in my rght and no grip in my left hand. I'm wheel chair bound (manual for now) and have a pot belly that I absolutely HATE!  My nerves don't activate muscles below my breast.  What comes with that is a Depends brief during the day, a condom catheter while I'm sleeping and straight cathing during the day.  A bowel program 3times/wk to eliminate waste.  Use your imagination on that for details. This has been a huge lifestyle changer, obviously.  I'm thankful that I had no brain injury and I'm not in any pain.  I know several others that are on pain meds that give them constipation and bad teeth.  They complain constantly.  I don't because nobody wants to hear it.  I'm writing this so that you'll read my advice below. I was not speeding, but I was driving faster than the conditions allowed.  What really was the cause of my fishtailing was I had just bought 2 new tires that were put on the front.  Front wheel drive put them on the front right?  WRONG!  Too much friction in the front and I had marginal tires in the rear.  Now I'm told that the tire places will always put the new tires on the rear as policy. I hope that my little ditty here may save you a hydroplaning accident.  God Bless,  Greg
It's blatantly obvious who many of the players were and none of them were bin Laden.  
Sup bro, I'm bored and sober too. Difference is, I choose not to go to parties, as they are kind of boring when sober. 
I have another fat one.  I walked into an apartment (didn't know who lived there) I look in the living room and saw two fat girls dancing on the coffee table.  I tell the person closest to me "Better watch out, that table's gonna break any second now".  I then went onto the crowded balcony, and  "broke dance" (This was the first and only time), needless to say this is about all I remember from that night.
Play a little Doom in his honor ftp://ftp.idsoftware.com/idstuff/doom/win95/ You can also find ports for your OS. Also feel free to post more of his work.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pYAREvR7zW0  Better^
The real problem is that politics in America works this way, politicians can be bought. This is an obvious example but what about the other examples that are not so obvious and do not make the headlines? Is this democracy? Is this what the founding fathers imagined?  It seems to me that if you have enough money and enough influence you can get what you want from the government. This does not make good public policy. This does not make the US a great country.
Reminds me of the fake owls and hawks they stick in places to scare off pigeons. 
Bon Jovi - Living on a Prayer and anything fatboy slim.
I believe there should be a statute requiring such, but no - they are under no legal obligation to identify the charges at the time of arrest.
Be Morgan Freeman.
What's weird about questioning whether or not the discussion was being motivated by concern for one another? It seems pretty clear that it was not
And we know hes a Freemason Shriner How?
It's not so much the fact that it is a dead body (which wouldn't bother me at all), but that it is **half a body**. 
A more integrated global political and economic structure could be good or bad depending on what he means by it. There's nothing in that quote that's scary, as written.
ok... I may be Christian but I have to admit -- this is hillarious.
Enjoy it but don't let it be an excuse to be lazy. 
I got it as part of a MGS sound pack for my iPod on Cydia. Give me a few minutes to SSH into the theme folder and I'll upload it for you.
hahahaha dude i read that from the top clockwise and now i cant stop laughing
I don't doubt the way SHE saw it. But that's not the way we, as society, should review her actions. She should have gone to seek proper help. Choosing to take his life takes her outside the zone of her authority. Now she pays the price for it. It is UNFAIR to her life as a whole, certainly, but its no less fair to him. He deserves a trial just like everyone else. It is easy to demonize those you've silenced.
that's funny, because the first thing I thought (as an atheist) was to send this on, but remove the 'mindless' part since it is obnoxious and rude and generalizing, kind of like you.
FUCK NO!  I enjoy alcohol, and minor alcohol consumption is good for you.  I don't smoke, I think it's a nasty habit that ruins your lungs (even though I can agree that MJ is safer than Tobacco) but I could never give up my Vodka.
Is not property rights just the government using force to tell people what can and cannot be owned? 
Uh, why hasn't anyone mentioned Avast! yet?  http://www.avast.com/eng/avast_4_home.html My favorite windows antivirus :)
Yeah, look through the docs. If you know Bash already that would help, too. The nvidia ebuild isn't typical.
You might say the doom box artist...  *puts on sunglasses*  Died of cardiac arrest...  *YEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH*
Watching him take Dr.Werner down a few notches is as sexually gratifying as dropping a nuclear bomb on a wave of 60 upgraded zerglings.  Or making it past 5 minutes on L4D survival mode.  
Ummm... if you are that keen on having him "Back up" his statement, how about doing the research yourself? After all, you're the one wanting the stats, not him. But I do agree with him. Men sleeping with teenage girls- filthy pedos! Women sleeping with teenage boys- lucky guys, she must be a cougar, poor lady! A bit biased don't you think?
I was on the phone to a friend while drunk when he put his friend Roxy on. I notice that I am now talking to a female and inquire who she is. She replies "It's me Roxy". I must of misheard her because I shouted as loud as I could "RODNEY? WHO THE FUCK IS RODNEY"...We haven't spoken since...
Ableton Live?  Just use your mouse + hotkeys.  It's straight forward and easy, but of course why wouldn't you use a midi controller so you have some actual knobs to turn or volume sliders or sticky toggles.  What is hard to do without a midi controller is control two knobs at once.  Chuck?  It's a programming language and looks great, I'll have to try it.  [http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Audio_programming_language](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Audio_programming_language)
Nope, I like my weed and my liquor.
yeaaa, best comic dude! 
Does anyone else remember when people thought it was obnoxious and rude when people would talk on their cellphones in a restaurant?  Well... get used to this phenomena as well, is my advice.
Why though? It helps us catch muslims.
Yes, I think that's the closest approximation.  "Laid off" sounds so final, whereas finding one's self "redundant" kind of indicates a lucky other person who was also redundant until one of the two got laid off.  :)
Not bad. I thought it would be cooler if the two O's were jack-o-lanterns.
Based on what? Your disagreement with his decision? Then no one is qualified. Every decision always pisses off someone. I'll trust the guy with the law degree and years of experience over someone on reddit with 3% of the facts of the case.
I always wondered why streetlights weren't motion-sensitive. It'd save a lot of electricity... no people moving around, no need for the light.
Remember Sarah Palin?
I was at Sam's Club 3 weeks ago.  They already had the (fake) Christmas trees up.
Yeah I know what you mean. I had to reread it a few time before I could understand what it actually meant. Its usually the hardest part for me.
Ha. I happened to be replaying Shining in the Darkness when I stumbled across this post.
Even though the Psycho remake was shot exactly the same, there was a world of difference between it and the original. The acting alone, as you mentioned, is a major difference, and that difference doesn't exist between [rec] and Quarantine.   There may be no real justification for Quarantine's existence, but that doesn't make it significantly worse than [rec], it just makes it pointless. There's no reason why someone should not be able to sit through Quarantine but think that [rec] is awesome.  And yeah, maybe you don't prefer it solely because it's foreign, but the whole being-cooler-if-you-like-the-(preferably foreign)original thing isn't exactly new or rare, and it's the mainly what I see when I hear opinions like this.
&gt; can anyone recommend good RPGs that allow co-op Diablo 1 &amp; 2... &gt; have little to no grinding involved? ...nevermind
Invitation sent.
Pretty much. From the Orthodox perspective, the Catholic Church needed (needs) reforming but the Protestants threw the baby out with the bathwater, creating a very watered down version of Christianity.
For the same reason we don't call donating to the Policeman's Benevolent Association bribery, even though it is.
"yet unknown scientific phenomenon,"  Essentially this.  You can identify the the pressure points along the meridians by increased electrical conductivity.  But beyond this, there is really no explanation.  Why you are sure that this unknown phenomenon has nothing to do with what are called qi meridians I have no idea.  Were all the millions of practitioners and thousands who advanced it just lying to look like they were cool?  And this on top of those points being measurable with machines.
Drivers and such.
Actual Narcissist are only about 1% of the the overall population which is pretty rare. Everybody has narcissistic traits to some degree, some more than others, but that's different.
Yeah, what he said. Though, from my experience, it was rare for that to happen for a hat. Now if it fell off where a ride op can get it without locking out the power, no sweat.
Probably a bad similie: text chat with avatars to depict yourself.  Woo - quasi real-time reddit chat thread.
Too bad that the moral choices you make for 95% of the game don't affect the ending at all, otherwise it would have warranted multiple playthroughs just to see various endings.
It's a travian ripoff, like tribalwars.
Legacy code, vector drawings and some fancy animations. But i don't code anymore for flash, i much prefer dealing with the other nightmare : browsers compatibility.
no, it dosnt work like that. Unlike other living creatures, only humans have the most unique brain. Just because one person isnt able to survive on thier own dosnt mean they deserve to die. By that logic, if you have kids why dont you send them out and tell them to live for them selves and see how long they last.
You forgot an "or stupid" there in your little comparison. :)
There's a program to convert the private key from OpenSSL to Cryptlib format (pemtrans), but not the other way around.
recycle girl: still a slutty costume, but give me extra attention because it's not a slutty cat or a slutty nurse or a slutty devil.
No no no that's correct.  Homeopathic medicine does not use the evil westernized big pharma jargon of quality.  Rather they use quliaty, pronounced kwu-liaty.  Which is an ancient Chinese form of health measurement based on energy and chee.
Default emacs keybindings suck. See if you like ergoemacs  http://code.google.com/p/ergoemacs/
That just like... oh nevermind.
I totally second pwnium's comment - you should totally think about joning in.   A number of us have been lurking around this subreddit since it's infancy, been hashing out story ideas and just trying to figure out a way to keep things fair AND resonably open and democratic.  Even though you've missed the deadline, if you're interested in contributing to the story team, or wherever else you think you might fit - sign up on the google groups, join a team, and get your vote in on the existing stories, asap (voting is scheduled to close tomorrow)! 
map ` fmt -w 72
I'm allergic to bees.  They cause me to....die.
No, I didn't mean your legs...
 #!/bin/echo Hello world!
Depends what you mean by 'great'. I used to pirate, I don't anymore, mostly because anything that has come out recently has been appallingly bad. Or free, and great, like DDO.
Duke sucks. 
They are, sir, they are. So far, the only two things that I've attempted are writing(Which didn't last long.) And that chat thing merom suggested. You got anything?
Trackmania Nations Forever runs almost flawlessly in WINE, it's not a linux game, but who's counting? :)  (I play it daily too, I've been addicted for some time now)
Absolutely NOT.
take another toke and lets be friends 
isn't the death penalty still legal in the UK (or is it just England) for treason ?
Avast is one of the free engines that I can't make my switchblade beat.  ClamWin is FOSS but the lack of realtime scanning removes it as a front-line choice for me. M$ Security essentials is fair, but IMO shouldn't be trusted by itself.  I liked avg until I started tweaking the avkill.exe on my switchblade. Didn't take much for avg to see game over, but I was specifically trying to beat it.
Yes, but the difference is who they kill. If a flu kills millions of small children and old people, there is no cause for concern. It is tragic, sure, but no cause for general alarm. If it kills healthy adults with healthy immune systems, then there is cause to pay attention.
&gt;I refuse to let deceitful politicians, or anyone else, take hope and change away from me.  Then, with all due respect, you're living in denial.  Nothing has changed, and to hope it has ignores the simple fact of our lives that (for example) the government can kick down our doors and shoot us dead (or just imprison us for a couple decades) for something that is our own private business, and harms no one else.  (I'm talking here of drug use, but it's hardly the only example.)  I wish that I too could live in the denial your statement seems to indicate you do.  I'd be a much happier person.  (And I genuinely mean no insult or disrespect with this - you ought to be free to pursue your happiness through denial, just as I ought to be free to pursue my happiness through drug-induced avoidance. ;) )
Slutty Battle of Belmont
Unfortunately, this is all they have to say:   &gt;Hello, Thank you for contacting Steam Support. The terms of the transaction, including the price, were outlined at the time of your purchase. Unfortunately, our billing system is automated and we have no option to offer a partial refund on a game or to apply a credit to your account. We apologize for any inconvenience, and appreciate your understanding.   tl;dr "We don't care"  Not their usual attitude as far as I've seen, I must say.
Are you dense? WE give cops the rights, under very particular circumstances. Usually when they're being directly threatened. You're comparing her to soldiers in war? Seriously? What the FUCK.
True..  My first relationship was pretty late (17) and lasted for almost 4 years so it was pretty serious.  There were times when even though I could see a long term future with her, I kind of wanted to try other girls before committing.  
Touching story, I'm glad you took action. Magical Thinking is dangerous, one of the things I've realized since leaving The Church.  Did you convert that family? What was your reunion with them like, Were you atheist at the time?
You can watch the simpsons online for free at wtso.net. Numb your brain with televison. Or wallow in you sorrow and listen to some sad music or watch something really sad and cry like a little bitch. If your well of tears is anything less than bottomless, crying helps. Cry until the snot runs from your nose and you're left a quivering, whimpering mass on the floor. Then clean yourself up and go for a walk. I don't know what else to tell you.
Yes, I think it would be really cool actually.
...and if you aren't in a contract, and could choose either provider?  I'm in Canada and this phone isn't here yet, but we are a week away from all three major providers offering the iphone, so its a simpler here. Even if I wanted the Droid I couldn't get one yet.
Upvoting doesn't say anything visible about *you*. :)
Upvoted for blah blah blah.  I don't give a fuck about what you fucking clicked on.
More importantly, Chiefs are elected by the citizens of their community and they head a council of other representatives. The institution isn't much different than a mayor, so I don't see any reason it should be abolished.  Plus, Chief is a waaaay cooler position than mayor.
It claims you have GPS in your phone or a bluetooth GPS device pairs with the phone, it does announce turns. Don't know how good it is since I do now have GPS on my phone, but I don't really doubt the announcing works well because all the other voice stuff works surprisingly well (e.g. looking up addresses/businesses by voice).  I don't know what happens if you veer off course. 
Tossin salad.  Especially on a girl with nice trim and who's never had it done before.  Bent over too.
Sweden has a population of 9.2 million. Norway has a population of 3.2 million. The US has a population of 307 million, and 50 states. The mean number of people per state in the US is about 6.1 million. I wouldn't say that Sweden or Norway are centralized in the same sense that the United States is centralized. You might say they're centralized in the same sense that North Carolina and Connecticut are centralized. By American standards, that makes them quite decentralized.
We're up to Episode 14.  The reason Jericho was cancelled is it went from being an interesting show to being a tawdry melodrama.  It's ehh.
You can use Java for webapps without buying in to one of the J2EEWTFBBQ frameworks.  Just hook some lightweight pieces and go.  Mind you "proper enterprise" uses all this crap because the buzzwords make them happy.  Don't aim for "enterprise", aim for "quality programming".
I don't mind, I don't believe in god...if I have to lie, I say that I believe in God. I don't care.
Those FDIC agents sure are bustin' their asses this year.
I totally read that as BSOD mask.  Needless to say, I was disappointed.
Thnks!   Some of the macros are a little dated, but I can modify them easily enough. This should help quite abit. I have a mage as well, and I just love PvP with him.  He's only mid 60's ATM, but he's a tailor so I think I may just level him in BGs and make whatever armour I need for him.  I absilutely love that I can give a team mate a chance against a rogue or two when I'm in Frost spec.  Then I love catching little Hoardies on fire too! Muhahahahahaaa!
The same one who sent me that email?
for work, Exumas.  For US, Long Island.  I hear Man O War is quite nice.  Haven't been much in the northern Bahamas. so often, people say, "Oh!  I've been to the Bahamas!  I was in Freeport, and Nassau just last year, on a cruise!"  aaarrrrghhh.  that's NOT "the Bahamas"!!
For me: iPhone is the winner and I have it and I love it. I won't switch to the Droid even when my contract is up. 
The death penalty is the ultimate barbaric and degrading punishment. It contributes only stress and terror to society. INNOCENT family members of the condemned are needlessly psychologically tortured. And for what? Nothing. Absolutely nothing.
Lol
&gt;Why is offensive action limited to self-defence?  Because violence without legitimate justification sucks and shuold be avoided.  &gt;The person who'd be doing the action, of course. What are you expecting, the Anarchist Politburo?  That's actually my underlying point. It's hard for me to condemn them. They probably feel like their backs are against the wall and offensive violence is necessary to combat the State.   It's easy to have a knee jerk reaction saying that the "Urban Guerrillas" should not use violence, but not knowing who they are or why they felt it necessary, I can't reasonably speak against their actions even though I'm a proponent of non violence. Neither can I support their violence without knowing why it has taken place.   &gt;The fact that they are autonomous, free sentient beings.  That alone doesn't give them the right from an anarchist perspective, imho.   However, their actions can be justified. Considering everything else you've said, perhaps it can be legitimatized, but more information is needed. Which will only come if they claim responsibility. (who they are and why they did it)   Thanks for responding
I went up to a professor and professed my love for black women to him.  He's the only black man in the department and he's the department head.  This was two nights ago and I would have never known had not someone told me.  Lesson learned, always eat before department get togethers and always stop at 3 glasses of red wine.  At least everyone else was hammered.
User for 16 minutes. Damnit! I had faith that there was actually someone out there waiting for this.
It looks like he ripped off the design from whatever print media you submitted. The image you have clearly shows that it's from a magazine, and unless he submitted it and had it published two weeks ago, then it's a blatant ripoff.
All year long the grasshopper kept burying acorns for winter, while the octopus mooched off his girlfriend and watched TV. But then the winter came, and the grasshopper died, and the octopus ate all his acorns. And also, he got a racecar. Isn't any of this getting through to you?
It's cool in that the teacher spent a lot of time to get his students interested in his class, but not cool in that the way in which he chose to do so did not contribute to their learning at all but was merely "LOL VIDEO TRICKS", as you put it.
Are you getting shot in the face? If no, then it's nothing compared to real war.
&gt;   chick tract   What is that?  
Hi Dexter.
IMO, posts like these should'nt be in /r/linux, since they have about as much to do with Linux as it does to Windows.  Options that don't require you to leave your apartment: pay someone else to rent movies from a public library and deliver it to you. If you live in a city without a good library system, pay a friend who lives in a big city to rip them for you (grey area of legality). Seriously, if only people realized how useful public libraries are, they would get more funding and put monopolies like Netflix out of business. If you enjoy watching movies with other people, yet another option is to purchase a big HDTV; the DVDs will find their own way to your house. 
More here: http://rangit.com/search-engine/the-funny-side-of-google-suggest/
It shone,   Pale as bone,   As I stood there alone,   And I thought to myself how the moon,   That night,   Cast its light,   On my heart's true delight,   And the reef, where her body lay strewn.
I would join that party.
Justice system?? Don't you mean *legal system*? If you are going to use the term justice system I think it needs to appear in quotes. I was going to put a sarcastic smiley face, but it's not really that funny is it?
Please explain.  Can't God just make as much money as he needs?  
Ever play the DS?  It has some of the best games of the generation.  'A decent game for once'?  Are you fucking mentally handicapped?
You can just call yourselves married with a private ceremony. The State doesn't have to be involved.
nerf the world
wat
Seriously I was wondering the same exact thing, I posted [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/9zrdm/marxism_cat/) before and it doesn't show up on the new page at all.
Actually you would want to look for ISI, the Pakistani Secret Service. They wired $100,000 dollars to Atta one year before the attacks.  [Lieutenant General Mahmood Ahmed in 2000. [Source: Reuters]In 2002, French author Bernard-Henri Levy is presented evidence by government officials in New Delhi, India, that Saeed Sheikh makes repeated calls to ISI Director Lt. Gen. Mahmood Ahmed during the summer of 2000. Later, Levy gets unofficial confirmation from sources in Washington regarding these calls that the information he was given in India is correct. He notes that someone in the United Arab Emirates using a variety of aliases sends Mohamed Atta slightly over $100,000 between June and September of this year (see June 29, 2000-September 18, 2000 and (July-August 2000)), and the timing of these phone calls and the money transfers may have been the source of news reports that Mahmood Ahmed ordered Saeed Sheikh to send $100,000 to Mohamed Atta (see October 7, 2001). However, he also notes that there is evidence of Sheikh sending Atta $100,000 in August 2001 (see Early August 2001), so the reports could refer to that, or both $100,000 transfers could involve Mahmood Ahmed, Saeed Sheikh, and Mohamed Atta.](http://www.historycommons.org/timeline.jsp?the_isi:_a_more_detailed_look=mahmoodAhmed&amp;timeline=complete_911_timeline)
they probably will trade in your $1 worth of slack for $0.50, accumulate them, and buy cheap drug anyways, hah. 
If facebook is anything to go by, the rest of the world is not advancing in the social arena at all.
Thanks. I will if I can!
I think he might mean a 'realistic' (using that word as tentatively as possible) modern world, not quite like Earthbound, which was more like the cast of Penuts vs Cthulhu  [attributed to Yahtzee].
Maelstrom for the Mac,Seven Cities of Gold for the C-64.
&gt; The fact that an NP is hard is the basis for crypto.  It's a one way street though. P = NP implies no crypto. P != NP on the other hand, says nothing on our current crypto-systems as none of them is based on NP-hard problems (and in fact factoring/DLOG being efficiently solvable quantumly suggests they are not THAT hard)
"This is my chance to make fun of how often Chrono Trigger is mentioned in Best Game threads, *and* it will be a golden opportunity to be the first to mention it because no one in their right mind would think *anyone* forgot about Chrono Trigger!" Damn you tcash21.
FOR GREAT JUSTICE!
I've used it for years. It's pretty good, better than trying to connect via a browser (even Opera).
so google will have to pay broke los angeles if some hacker steals data from los angeles?  surely california's money woes can not be solved that easily?  are the ad's on craig's list for hackers willing to work on this yet?
Congrats
The end of that game sucked, if you ask me. I know the puzzle that you're talking about and yeah, it took many tries and quite a lot of luck to get the bastard right in the end.  I remember being stuck on the 'Buddha' part of the game for *weeks* - I couldn't for the life of me work out what I was supposed to do. When I did work it out, I felt mighty stupid. The puzzles in that game were pretty silly most of the time, but it was the first 'cinematic' game I'd ever played, and I was blown away by all the live action FMV. Nowadays I see footage of the game and I laugh at it.  Upvoted for having played Burn:Cycle! I don't think I've ever met anybody else who recognises the name of that game. :)
I'm surprised more true blue Christian god-fearing Americans haven't awakened yet to some of the things this guy from Nazareth said.  Seriously, who died and put Him in charge?  Look, we all know how those Jews can be sometimes, especially those holier-than-thou love-thy-neighbor types.  They just want to weaken America.  Christians, stand up and unite against Christ!
If you are interested in learning about Orthodox theology I'd suggest [The Orthodox Way](http://books.google.com/books?id=HG8c-lUZIDEC&amp;printsec=frontcover&amp;source=gbs_navlinks_s#v=onepage&amp;q=&amp;f=false).
Cyber Dogs - I spent so much time playing that on co-op.
I'm a DC boy born and raised so I've got all the Blackest Night stuff, Justice League (A Cry For Justice and the regular series), all the Batman stuff so I can figure out wtf is up with Bruce Wayne and a little of the Superman stuff giong on now.
Someone should do a recreation of what a war would be like if it were more like COD4.
Interesting. E is famed for bringing on a sense of empathy and connectedness - was wandering what it would do for you. Cocaine allegedly removes the filter between what you want to say and what you actually say (turns a lot of people into complete arseholes) so, again, an interesting experiment.   I've taken E and found it very dependent on who you're with - I recently had an experience where all the "watch these dodgy fuckers" flags went off at once. Never did Cocaine.  Report back to class, please :)  *Very* interesting IAMA. Thanks.
Republicans = Religion in schools, anti aborition, anti gay marriage, pro businesses/monopolizing.   Government ran by the bible (the southern christian kind) = Republicans.  Sadly, this is not what the original Republicans intended, but, thats how it is now.  
&gt;Whats wrong with a push mower?  Goats are cheaper than Mexicans.
the game starts with the bald headed video intro, but when it gets to a menu (i think) all i see is a blank screen, but i can hear the music and the mouse sound effects.  no luck with finding any info on this either.
Thank you. Invitation sent.
It looks solarized.  I hate HDR, but this makes a mockery of even bad HDR.
Indeed
Will you answer all questions ?
The fraudulent war on terror is shoved down our throats.  Every.  Day.
Looking at family is only an indicator. There isn't ONE gene responsible for Male Pattern Baldness, and it comes from BOTH sides of the family (I don't know why people still think it's a maternal trait. ONE of the genes associated with it is, but the others are on the Y chromosome as well).   If it's going, it's going to go. You can get some transplant surgery, use rogaine, or cut it short and hope for the best. My Grandpa went totally bald at 16, every male on my mother's side is bald, my dad is going bald, and I'm still doing ok at 24. 
"Black Christmas" is pretty good.
"I hate [[insert]](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1323932/quotes)." - Francis, L4D.
I'd give Low (with Eno and Bowie) a try.
I'm no web site designer, but the vatican's homepage just seems like it's all wrong.
Post-colonial is after a state of colonialism. Post-religious would be after a state of religiosity, and since I'm post-colonial by virtue of my country no longer following colonialism, I can't be post-religious in the same way because it's still a very religious country.
It constantly confounds me as to how people with no formal education in these fields feel like they have the right to an opinion.  I mean... you can KIND of bullshit it in fields like English and Econ (As an Econ major it is painful to listen to people talk about Econ...) but... to try and have an opinion on purely quantitative matters is absurd.
The story elements are too pat. It strikes me as total fiction, and in support of Obama's socialism. If I were sitting on a jury I would vote fake without hesitation. You also have assumed an editor would be involved. As for ellipses, I use them exactly same way when writing for informal venues... (no, I did not write it.) Re grammatical errors... it is more verbal than prose, and presented that way. It might irritate an English teacher but our ears don't cringe.   As for knack. I'm one hell of a writer, in fiction and fact, and while I might have a good first draft in two hours I would spend far more time on such a work. Indeed, the shorter the form the more work and time it takes. Novels are easy to write. I've done nine. Three hundred word short short stories take weeks to write. (I've won two short short story contests so I know something of that. They have to have a plot, dialogue, a beginning, middle and end, epiphany et cetera. That's a mean task in 300 words. Only poetry is more difficult.) I took a full week to do a 1,000 word piece for Trump. Then again, it was worth $900, not a throw-away. While it is all just opinion, my opinion is it is pro-Obama propaganda, read fiction, not fact. Or said another way, if I were hired to write something like that for propaganda that is close to what I would write: Race, poverty, innocent child, hunger, callous people, the cold of winter, hope for change, white guilt et cetera. Yeah, it was crafted and is fiction. 
Yeah, because 50 million people voted for him based on his promise to buy his kids a puppy.
No, the Secret Service does not run around deciding "who lives and who dies* anywhere near the President.
I hope you are being sarcastic.
tl;dr  yes, even the tl;dr summary
What an ass. I hope he got fired.
You drank his milkshake~!
&gt;This space intentionally left blank.  Is it really blank if there's a message there telling me it's blank?  It seems the space would now contain a message, wouldn't it?  
Yeah - same. I sleep 10 hours to feel 'normal.' Up to 12 to be 'well-rested.' I'll try xanax; I'll be in Thailand soon and drugs are easy to get there.  Thanks!
You're wrong. The way he used it, he is saying that it caused something to change. Not the end result. Effect would be as in cause and effect. Affect is to have an effect upon. As in to cause the change. So, "Did solitary help AFFECT any kind of personal transformation (aka caused the change)..." would be correct.
Counterpunch. That is all.
well google points to a province in colombia, so  stop looking at colombian porn
&gt; Show me a "user" who knows how to keep his Windows computer clean.  Uh, me? I'm not a sysadmin or an IT guy. I'm a photographer. The registry **is** an ungodly mess, like you say, but there should be no need for the average user to go there if they keep their system clean.  &gt; it's simply dishonest and counter-productive to say that Windows users can figure out the registry  No one is saying that, my friend. Most people don't even know what the registry IS, but that's not what we're discussing here. I'm just saying that any user with a decent understanding of computers won't need to even look at the registry.  Now, if you're talking about system customization, that's another story. We're talking about your average user here, and I don't know of many "average users" who try to customize their systems.  TL;DR: I'm not defending the Windows registry, I simply think that saying Windows users have to spend too much time fixing the registry to get their OS to work is a bit of reckless hyperbole.  P.S. Unicorns fucking rule!
But what if the poor people then use their superior genes to take over?
I don't think we have to worry about what boobs feel like =(
I often wonder as I walk down my street and see all the discarded styrofoam packages from Chinese take-out - in 50 years, will a child ask their parent in disbelief "So, you *knew* these plastic cartons wouldn't biodegrade, but you still used them to package *one* meal anyway?"
He said he was the "Adam of your\[Frankenstein's\] labours". He wasn't saying his name was Adam, he was making a comparison to [Adam](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Adam_%28Bible%29) from the old testament
Is it my penis?!  edit: no, definitely not my penis. 
This is why I stopped gaming on pc
I'm a proud lefty.  I learned to play in the left-hand guitar style, but I would actually say that if l could do it all over again I would choose to play in the right-handed style.  Here are some issues I've had being a lefty playing lefty:  * **It's hard to find left-handed guitars.**  When I go into a Guitar Center with my friends, they have about 200 guitars for them to choose from, pick up and jam on.  I have maybe 4, 2 of which are probably shitty.  The Taylor I've played since 01 I had to special order from a lefty guitar store in Texas (southpaw.net woop woop!). * **You can't just pick up a random guitar and play.** Since nearly everyone else is righty, you can't play a buddy's guitar.  Unless you want to learn upside down in addition to playing lefty, but even when you do this it sounds like poop and you'll find yourself making excuses for why it doesn't sound good.  * **Learning is a little more complicated.** Chord diagrams and other people's hands are all reversed.  Looking at others' hands was overcome-able (just pretend like you're looking in a mirror), but now when I look at more complicated chord diagrams, they're still confusing after 13 years.  * **Teaching others is a pain.** Corollary to 2 and 3.  I have a few younger cousins that are just learning, and I'd really like to teach them.  But, there's only so much I can do without picking up a guitar and showing them, which I obviously can't do, because I'm lefty.  Plus I'm always mixing up directional words when I'm talking to them about technique.   You can certainly be successful doing it either way, but this is my experience based on being a lefty playing lefty-style. Good luck!
Suikoden III. Suikoden is mentioned rarely, but III seems to be downright avoided for some reason. I don't know why, it was my first Suikoden game and my favorite (haven't played V though).
I agree it could very well be a great thing for humanity - but by what process were these people made to be the ones bringing it about? Who put them in charge? What do we really know about them, and their intentions? Do we, the people, have no say?
And a bunch of people signed up right after 9/11 to go "get those ter'rists". Now some of them are dead.
HA You only have ONE monitor?
I got Slutty Swedish Society of Actuaries ... Sounds like a Monty Python skit!
Why do you use a lower case "L" when referring to yourself?
Oh, that's kernel stuff. I make sure to get Linux-friendly hardware so I've never had to mess with the weird stuff.
Hmmmm....  I waited for a long time (couple minutes) but they don't seem to be going to sleep.  This is the one with four owls.  Am I just being impatient?
This doesn't look real
Sex.
Please explain how someone who is Pagan is a nut case or Wiccan for that matter.  My Gods aren't supernatural or anything...there is the earth and the sun and that is good enough for me.  I am laughing that you haven't a clue what a modern witch is.
do you work with unix?
The Bar is standardized, though, and it's hard as shit.
Wow, you have some crazy ability for noticing details.  Those are for sure lowercase 'el's.  Validated the ascii code for confirmation.
Graduate education in general screws a lot of people. I would say law school and business school are up there. But look more closely at humanities programs like philosophy, history, and literature etc., Lots more students go there to die financially than law school.
I'm not against socialized health care, but the bill being proposed is fucking psychotically WRONG, giving far too much control over our lives to the government, and actually goes against the constitution. Not only that, but health care costs have been driven up by the insurance companies. It would be wiser to have fully socialized health care than a government backed insurance alternative. We're just driving up the national debt while giving a government with already too much power more power.  Every citizen has to have a fucking medical ID card from the government? Government will have access to medical records? Are you guys serious?
Yo jez, I'm really happy for you and I'ma let you finish, but *"Yo _blank_, I'm really happy for you and I'ma let you finish but _blank_ was one of the best _blank_ of all time"* is the most annoying comment of all time. 
Where are you from?
As a person who's brewed various types of alcohol for almost a decade, I can assure you that it is ridiculously easy. Especially if you distill it into liquor afterwards, it's basically impossible to end up with anything but pure alcohol and water. I've never gotten food poisoning, even when I was starting out with nothing more than a baking yeast and grape juice in a 2 liter bottle.
I just really like the fade-in effect, like there is a ghost running the place.
Yeah its escapist fantasy to think crazy thoughts like: *be responsible for your own life* 
Lergo my ergo.   FTFY
Yeah. When I was a teen I had a guy running the same shit come knock on our door. The steak was crap, of course.
The [Hitler Diaries](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hitler_Diaries) in the german magazine "Der Spiegel".
You should watch "Death Note."
I generally agree that it's easier to grow a plant than brew and distill alcohol, but I regularly drink beer I make myself and enjoy it more than most commercial stuff. If it were legal, I would distill my own liquor, too. Nothing that will kill you can grow/live in beer, much less distilled alcohol.
Can't remember it exactly...  "After a few days of some R&amp;R, I'll be ready for some more action." "Come back to bed duke, I want some action - nooowwww."  or, from same game...  "Time to kick ass and chew bubble gum...and I'm all out of gum."  Duke Nukem
Have you SEEN Gladiator?
you say small and isolated like it's a bad thing.  mendocino is my idea of paradise.
Marriages should be arranged by the parents, who also settle disputes.  Slapping your wife around? Expect a visit from her father or brothers to slap on you some.  Constantly nagging your husband? Expect your mother-in-law to move in for a month.  Personally, I think my solution would reduce divorce and domestic violence by 90%
Read that again.  It shouldn't have been released yet, not wasn't.
That seems to be a mistake on the article writers part. I believe a good portion of the implementation effort was done a year or 2 ago.
You can smoke that shit too!!  *Castoreum is also used in small amounts to contribute to the flavor and odor of cigarettes.*   wiki
It isn't pedantry it's accuracy. In this context the difference between a necessary assessment of relative risk and the claim of no risk is rather significant, wouldn't you say?  No. Guess you wouldn't.
Pentium D is not 10 years old. It is also not 1 ghz.
I'm a lefty and I play guitar, bass, drums all left-handed, but I've known lefties who play right handed. The righty who learned on my lefty acoustic took to it incredibly well and actually became a really technically proficient player. The fact that his picking hand was his weak one didn't become an issue for a couple years, and by that point he'd gotten so used to playing left-handed he couldn't switch.   It's definitely doable, I think it just comes down to personal preference.   Oh and finding lefty guitars is more difficult, but not impossible, especially thanks to [Rondo](http://www.rondomusic.com/electricguitarleft.html). 
upvoted for Home Alone reference!
Conservative friends say:  ZOMG OBAMA'S SO DUMB HE'S GOING TO LET ALL OF THE OTHER STRAINS INTO OUR COUNTRY  I don't know if this is true or false. I tend to assume they're wrong.
Basic on a Amstrad 464. Later on a LOT of amos on the Amiga. Did anyone of you use amos???
Exactly right.  that's how it works. 
Well, it's that it takes one to know one, you know?  American immigrants believed the land was given to them by God ("Manifest Destiny" and all that), and considered the original inhabitants nothing more than sub-human vermin to be eradicated.  So in order for Americans to see the truth about the settlers they'd have to be willing to see it about themselves.  Instead, both sides support each other like drug addicts telling each other they don't have a problem.  (Actually, it doesn't even make much sense to see them as two separate sides, more that Israel is a more recent (and final) incarnation of the same energetic force that settled America.)
&gt;Papal infallibility (while speaking ex cathedra) or determinism for instance.  And *sola scriptura* for the Protestants. Probably the main reason why Protestants are so fractured.
how much ass kissing did you have to do to get a bar job.
Trolling always works. Maybe not on reddit, but find somewheres where people are internetting it up and troll them.  You could try learning to program, I'm sure someone could point you to a tutorial.   You could start a blog about sobriety, google we quit drinking.   I don't know. I'm bored as fuck, gonna work out as soon as trick or treating time is done, so I can use my lights without being bothered.  What music do you like? I can reco you some new music. 
That sounds like an amazing skill and you should definitely keep doing that. Genuine contact with people, especially strangers, is so rare with a lot of people (at least in my experience). As for your date, I'd say do what you do, but try and keep it light and fun. Theres no reason you can't have a good time while talking about intimate details of your life. You seem to be good at it, so try and stay away from negative topics. I don't see a reason for this to really be a problem unless you get them to admit something they never wanted to tell you.
Another older guy not in good shape either here!  Good for you! I've been thinking about it myself but no guts.  About cock size: the bottom line is that it does the job it's intended for and you both have fun. 
If you spell it out clearly and tell the truth in the first place, what confusion is there? Do it right and he knows. Hem and haw and lie and he wonders.
Yeah when I look at it actually I don't think it would look right without the beaver tail.
Considering that Friends was one of the most successful shows ever, and is fairly new, what's so bad about getting the reference?  Come on, it was actually pretty funny sometimes.
I don't agree with you, but I appreciate your thought. Address, please. :-)
Don't feel bad, I put off a really bad ass halloween party to stay home.   Just don't feel like drinking, or spending money. Don't feel like socializing, these are people that never speak to me most of the year, and now they want me to come over? yeah, just so they can pick apart my life and compare it to theirs and tell me why mine isn't on par? I think I will pass.   Its not because they really want to hang out it with me, its more of an investigation into how I am doing as a person now
Oh Google I love you so.  Sigh.
My name is Iorek Byrnnison. AMA.
Judeo-Christian-Islamic is how I classify it.  Patriarchal "cultures" is probably a better label for the problem to be addressed in the case of these girls sentenced for killing or otherwise overpowering abusive men.
1) The average day varies a lot throughout the year depending on what everyone is doing. There are days where a lot of us just do our own thing and days that we're collaborating on stuff. I've had very busy time periods but ever since finishing up Madness Accelerant I've been in a more chillaxed mode... Dabbling with ideas, making sure upcoming features are coming along right, staying on top of what everyone on the site is up to, keeping the game of the week line-up going and getting ready for a big genre overhaul. I've been doing a 9-5 deal this month but that is also because I wasn't around for all of September except to sleep for the most part.  Bob has been working on the wide site layout (html and css).  Stamper has been doing the wide site visual design work.  MindChamber has been working on a game and a movie.  JohnnyUtah has been working on a game, site odds n ends (like halloween graphics) and some movies.  Tim is doing server management and will soon be starting on the downstairs space transformation.  Mike is working on a game and some more fun stuff.  Liljim is working on a feature that's part of a bigger system being worked on by PsychoGoldfish.  Rob is working on the new games and movies listings at the moment.  Wade's dealing with user / administrative stuff, as do I on a daily basis since a lot of people come to me with stuff.  2) I get motivated to hire new staff members when we can afford it, but the goals from the past two years have made that difficult. We cut back on the ads and I'm very determined to maximize user revshare. On that note we do have one hire planned for the next year, but that will be announced officially at a later date.  3) In general I consider programmers the most necessary component of NG, because the features are our big bottleneck. Everyone can talk talk talk about what NG needs to do but only the programmers can do it. We have enough ideas for 100 programmers.  4) We actually had a programming intern this past summer! He developed a feature that also plugs into what Goldfish has been doing, so he'll get his spotlight when all that is finally revealed. We also had interns in the past but they were non-paying and I can't bring myself to boss around non-paid people, so they were more learning experiences with learning Flash and stuff.
The organizations never helped me.  They tried to shuttle me off to the state, which isn't what I wanted.  I wanted my mom and dad.  So no, your just paying for the CEO's salary in case you haven't read in the news, most make over 100k.
Crystalis?
If the primary use case is for streaming data, wrapping buffers in file-like objects _is_ the sane thing to do.
Of course not.  My mistake.  It was simply happenstance that the Hague Convention outlawed hollow point and expanding bullets in warfare.
'Monetary asset bubble' is not such a big phrase, it is not a phrase to stat with. Just a few words put together to describe an economic condition. Perhaps I wouldn't use the word monetary in the same context, some redundancy there. 'Systemic moral hazard' has meaning, perhaps not for everyone. Also you have to think how the GDP number is calculated and what it means. The bigger problem is that the number of jobs lost is still bigger than the one created.  Without a huge gain in productivity you can't have an increase in the GDP without going deeper into debt or devaluing the currency.
Although I support the monarchy, the BNA is far from working splendidly.
I disliked Crichton (and the unconvincing technobabble) so much at the start that I gave up after a few episodes when it was being shown on TV. It was only several years later when a friend gave me the first series DVDs that I persevered enough to start liking it.
I owe him cash now. 
What other made up words do you use?
I'm not a part of your club, ok. There's no "our standards." Get that into your head.
Wash me out when you are done with me, so a man from the city doesnt have to when you find me on the side of the road?
I used this (from the same Dragon article) for one of my best campaigns. It works really well for low-magic campaigns, where you'd rather the characters weren't dripping with enchantments.  One thing that I stopped doing after a few levels was requiring the PC to spend XP to improve the item. Mainly I did it because not all the characters in the game had leveled weapons, and the ones without started to level earlier, which caused bookkeeping, encounter and envy problems. :)  In my game, the weapons were two legendary weapons left as heirlooms to the PCs. They started life as masterwork weapons, topped out at +3 and had a slew of themed powers. Their names were Dawn and Dusk (in gaelic). One had powers that were all about standing out--shedding light (of course), inspiring others, etc. The other had powers that were about concealment--blurring/hiding the owner, stealthy bonuses, etc.  The third leveled weapon was a battle standard that acquired powers through the piety and loyalty of its guardian, a PC who was an older bodyguard type assigned to watch over the two brothers that owned Dawn and Dusk. The standard blessed those fighting nearby, helped resist fear effects and was a wicked spear to boot.  In a game like that, which was basically a Game of Thrones set in a fantasy Scotland, it worked really well. No magic shops, no competing weapons, etc. There were hardly any spell casters to speak of (except the fourth PC) who were human. There was a lot of traveling to faerie, dealing with capricious, dangerous elves, talking to river spirits and animals...  It also made it easy to have unnatural/supernatural bad guys whose weapons behaved more like the enemy weapons in Lord of the Rings--they were magical, but they weren't anything you wanted to touch, let alone stick in your pack.  Good times!
Lovely pic.
Sadly, no. Someone else has posted on the link, "Absolutely hysterical! Thanks for the laugh Bob! :)"   (Bob being the fiction name of the guy who originally posted it)  So it is pretty much being ignored.  I have an overwhelming number of very conservative friends, and I'm honestly surprised that he hasn't just removed it by now.  That's what usually happens when I try and be witty on someone's facebook wall
Take [it](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KK-5ytg0gH4) slow.  Then [smash](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wOlR9-KxWT0) something.  Follow the [Caterpillar](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KH0A239VnPo).  All Better:)
&gt;More like a bag of dicks.  That are individually wrapped and distributed to children wearing masks and costumes.
i kind of wish that everyone would consider "is this worthwhile" before posting their comments.  There's so much trash that it's not really worth wading through some times.  Pretty much every story has some sort of meme or one liner as the highest rated comment.
I feel like the last time someone mentioned these scanners on Reddit the majority of comments sounded a lot like this post...
Yeah I got a laptop with really weird eth0 and eth1, :(
this comment brings up a good point, but it will be completely drowned out by the clucking of enraged hens.
&gt;the _Diamond Age_ is expected to begin in the range from 2025 to 2050 bringing an end to the current Information Age   FTFY
that's a really good point. I wonder if they don't consider that this could skew their user statistics when making decisions vital to their site: "lets see... we have 30,000 registered users, so that means we can charge X dollars more for each advertiser..."
I loved this show and have wanted to watch it again but could never find it.  Thankyou!
in NL - yes - your beer there is hella strong.  I was in Amsterdam last year and got totally hammered off a couple of Guinesses.  Cannabis is an afterthought there too.  Walk into a couple of smoke bars - drink a hot chocolate and smoke a joint is only cool if it is not available to you at any time. Personally -- I liked the smoke bars much better.  I had some great times hanging out at Barney's - even though the place was packed.  I had some great conversations with a couple from Beirut and a few really beautiful women from France.
First of all the comments being made are assuming we have all the facts, and second of all this was a complete travesty of justice, not a situation where it could've gone either way. Girl is abused and repeatedly raped for years, she fights back and kills her abuser, and she gets life imprisonment. It's insane. Not saying everyone will see it this ay, there are always people who differ.
parenting in general is indoctrination.  you indoctrinate your kid to like windsurfing like you, care about the environment like you, like their eggs scrambled like you, etc...  but inviting an entirely separate institution to come in and further indoctrinate your kids is a bit silly in my view.  so yes, raising your kids atheist is indoctrination but at least it is with direct communication between the parent and the child.  if you are so hard pressed for ways to teach your kids the difference between good and bad that you think you need a church, maybe you should reconsider having kids.  i can teach my kids morals on my own.  edit: clarity
Once when I was in Oshawa (those who know it will understand), at about 11:00 p.m downtown not far The Dungeon (seedy concert venue), a white van pulled up to me and my three friends. A man opened the sliding door. At this point I thought we were going to get abducted or murdered or something. Anyways, the guys says "Hey! Do any of you guys want to buy some condoms?" We looked at each other confused, and one of us said "nah, we're good, thanks...". He shut the door and they drove away. That is MY Oshawa story.
Could be.  Who knows.  We certainly don't.  We have no idea what the situation was before she was let go.  I would take exception to having to excruciatingly document every little infraction for months to fire someone is the mark of a "competent company". Having managed and worked on high performance teams, it is painfully obvious when someone sucks and is dragging the team down.  Yet, it is very difficult to catch them out on any actual rule-breaking.  
Hey if you still have copies, I'd take one off your hands.  Things like this remind me why the internet is awesome :-D
Mmmmmm... that's a tasty burger.
There are some important facts that the media consistently fails to mention:  1. H1N1 is more contagious than seasonal flu  2. H1N1 is less virulent than seasonal flu for most people, but is often more dangerous when things do go bad.  3. Normal folks who aren't really young, old, preggo, immunodeficient or healthcare professionals (or near one of the mentioned) should relax and if/when there is time (maybe) get a vaccine.  4. We're sitting right in the pandemic stage now, life is not grinding to a halt, nor has the zombie apocalypse begun.  5. [Regarding efficacy,](http://scienceblogs.com/effectmeasure/2009/10/journalists_sink_in_the_atlant.php) similar to seasonal flu shots, there is a small chance the vaccine will turn out to be worthless and a good chance it will be very helpful.   6. [The vaccine has not been shown to be dangerous](http://www.sciencebasedmedicine.org/?p=851) and is not untested (two common rumors I hear): The controversial ingredients in the vaccine have been used in many other medications and are well tested, such as the adjuvant Squalene, which has been shown not to be linked to neurological syndromes. Or mercury; somewhere around the level of a tunafish sandwich. Extensive studies have not been done on pregnant women, but depending on your locale, an adjuvant-free vaccine will be available usually sometime after the normal vaccine is distributed.   Edit: added links, cameldung, which should answer your question.
^ This
Ask not what the monarchy can do for you, but what you can do for the monarchy.
This.  Upvoted for truth.
Mathematics refers to things that are mathematical. So in a sense it can be seen as plural, though we might not think of it as such. See also physics, statistics or the phrase "the arts".  On the other hand the suffix -olog, used with the biology refers to the study of, study being singular.
IT'S NEVER THE RELIGIOUS.
Use me, reuse me.
No, property rights are contracts drawn up between individuals who have come to an agreement.  Property rights are part of the framework for those contractual relationships.  
Like... using our credit cards to send the girl flowers, or what?
I may be completely wrong, but I think that many others are very similar to you, only less aware of it. Who's to say who is better or worse anyway? I think the whole notion of correct behaviour is a falacy created by those that wished, and still wish, to control people. Besides, the some of the most important people to have walked this planet are those that didn't give a fuck about what others thought of them. I'd say you have more in common with many great people than you might think.
It's violence against the state. I think that's pretty much always legitimate justification, but then I'm certainly no pacifist.
I'm still trying to figure out whether I will celebrate Hallowe'en in future years. I'm not celebrating it this year, as I'm Mr. Buzz Killington, thinking it's the culmination of human ignorance and borne of the much of the hate and intolerance in this world, towards those who are different.  Occult religion becomes a big thing this time of year, and many kids are drawn to the allure of the dark, mysterious likes of Wicca. I am totally serious in saying this; in the places I've lived, there has been a substantial demographic of kids who embrace Wicca, often to the detriment of their own physical and mental health.  So yes, I realise that Hallowe'en is largely just an excuse to dress up and gorge oneself on candy, but there's no denying that it doesn't bear any semblance of rational behaviour.  Edit: Just to clarify, because I evidently didn't get this point across: I'm not saying I tell other people to stop celebrating Hallowe'en. I do not find anything appealing about it, and therefore do not dress up, and do participate, except for the sake of others who find enjoyment in it.  I would never tell anyone else to not celebrate Hallowe'en. I simply do not wish to do so myself, and would rather others do not demand that I do. This is the same thing with Christmas. While much of the holiday has lost its religious aspect, I still find it to have no allure. I do not celebrate it, and would rather others not think me a killjoy because of such.
Reddit can be *awesome* sometimes.
Your burbs smell of blood.
Thief! Filthy thief! I shall have your hand for that! - Assassin's Creed. Not particularly memorable, but when you've heard it 600 times it kind of gets to you.
When you shoot, between 5-10 seconds you start noticing the effects. First thing you notice is the "taste." When you inject certain drugs, they have a unique taste caused by the drug mixing with your blood and traveling through your taste buds. Anyway, second thing you notice is the "rush." The rush is unique to the iv roa, and to a much lesser degree smoking. I can't really describe it though, I'm sorry, it's kinda like asking someone to describe an orgasm. They'll probably just say something along the lines of "well you know, it just feels good." After that you notice warmth spreading from your stomach/chest and every muscle relaxing. Then it's just euphoria and not having a care in the world for the next 4-6 hours.
an EEG is the ultimate hangover test haha. That would suck to have one done hung over as hell... Probably have a seizure.
One time a few years ago I was riding my bike on the lakefront in Chicago and for some reason, all these aphids and gnats swarmed out of the ground... there became so many, the sun began to be clouded out a little.  It got to the point where I couldn't help but inhale a few dozen every time I breathed.  I got up on my bike, pedaled for a half block, and my chest had trapped about 500 of them, forming a pretty thick layer all over my shirt.  They got in my pants, too.  It felt like the wrath of God was coming down and personally fucking everyone over.  Gross.   This made me think of that.
Not angry at all. There are millions of fuckwits like this guy  - and you - all over the web trying to give advice. It's not possible to be angry after the least exposure to you.
I'm waiting for tomorrow. when the candy is super discounted. Mmmm Cavities. 
http://www.amazon.com/DEATH-CONTRACT-SECOND-GRANT-GILMORE/dp/081420676X
I know it's a process for some people, and sometimes you can help people realize a kink they didn't even know they had. I'm glad you're taking your time with them, and trying to educate and encourage them. But I also really hope you find someone who just sees it in you, and gives it to you the way you want it. You can see the spark in some girls eyes when you start getting rough, that look that tells you to keep going, to keep pushing to see where she wants to let it go to. As odd as it sounds, you sound like you have that look.  I've never been vanilla anything, and I have always loved eating a beautiful girls pussy. Especially if she enjoys a finger in her ass at the same time.  My favorite kind of sex is just rough; where there's plenty of biting, scratching, name calling, and hair pulling from both sides, and when it's over, everything smells like sex (bonus if it's in public). Otherwise, I love being in control. I always have a travel bag with a belt, some candles, a flail, and four point restraints close by, just in case I get real lucky that night.  Good luck. Rough and violent sex can be so much fun, and every girl should know what it's like to be licked and eaten to orgasm. Be careful in that nurses outfit, though; I have gotten into a lot of trouble because of hot girls in nurses outfits before. You find the right guy in that get up, and you just might find what you're looking for. ;-)
Something you need to understand about women. At any time, at any moment, and for no reason, they could stop loving you and that's it. I'm not sure how often men do this, but I doubt it's symmetrical. The best you can do is really make her jump through hoops before marriage. Oh, and be rich. 
I've seen third party drivers in windows update.
&gt; "He is the only active candidate in the race who supports lower taxes, fiscal responsibility and opposes Nancy Pelosi's agenda of government-run healthcare, more government and less jobs," they said. Mhm.. something tells me that this is not going to end well.
relationship questions: assuming you're a girl, what kind of guys do you end up with (if you've had a boyfriend by now)? just following the stereotype, i'm going to guess you end up with some massive, manly, protector type of guy.  if you have brothers (or you're a guy), has it been hard for them to find girlfriends? in my experience, guys who are too sheltered experience one of three outcomes:  1. extreme difficulty finding a girl (because what kind of girl wants an innocent guy) 2. they find a girl who's also been sheltered 3. they experience heartbreak a little too late in life and become more jaded than others  i didn't exactly have a sheltered childhood myself, but my mother often did things for me that i should've done myself. thankfully i left home and got to experience the hard life before it was too late.
Is your wife/girlfriend really that dumb to fall for that? What happens when none of the shows have sounds since most monitors don't have speakers
Yes, I will answer each and every question.
Blue Nile's list of Ale Saints Friday 30 October to 1 November 2009: Summit Great Northern Porter, Surly Bender, Surly Darkness 2008 &amp; 2009, Goose Island Bourbon County Stout, Bell's Rye Stout, Bell's Expedition Stout 2008, Lion Stout, Ceylon,  Old Rasputin Imperial stout, Southern Tier Oat Imperial Oatmeal Stout, Founder's Breakfast Stout, Flat Earth Black Helicopter, Troubadour Obscura, Sinebrychoff Porter, Finland,  Nogne-O Porter, Norway. Thes were all good and some better than others.  Nogne-O Porter
I want to see it duet with [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n8W2AxXfbvM).
You have to write a paper every day!?
Taylor Swift took a photo at Katy Perry’s Birthday Bash.  She posed with someone who had a Swastika on his shirt.
Fucking bible thumpers. They should just die and go to... The same place... Everybody...
A minor can't sign a contract.  So no apartment.
Women must be so hot there.
OK- slightly off topic, so downvoting is fair dinkum: commercial channels are paid for by advertising, and those costs are passed to the consumer, so even if you don't watch TV at all, if you buy things that advertise on TV, you're paying the premium. I just think that's worth thinking about.  Edit: - I don't work for the beeb (BBC to the non UK redditors)!
As a child who grew up with Doom that one single picture made me fall in love with Doom. Especially after seeing it on the first book in the series. That one picture has a lot of sentimental meaning to me... RIP Don.
Genius
I love Ancient Faith Radio. Very informative.  I think every convert to Orthodoxy remembers their first Divine Liturgy. It was so different from what I had been used to as a Presbyterian. It was beautiful and awe inspiring.
Watch your mouth!!
While this is true, thanks to Android's openness, there is already an app called App2SD which allows you to store apps on an SD card.  Props to masterdirk for pointing this out [in this comment](http://www.reddit.com/r/gadgets/comments/9znit/hands_on_iphone_3gs_vs_motorola_droid/c0f6h26)
Really all you have to do is make sure in a child-parent reference cycle to use weakrefs when storing child's ref to the parent. I use the following descriptor...   from weakref import ref as make_weakref   class weakref_property(object):   """descriptor which provides transparent access to stored object via weakref.    :param attr:    This allows specifying the attribute that will be used    to store the weak reference. By default, a random one    based on the property's id will be chosen.    usage::     class Test(object):     x = weakref_property("_x")    """   def __init__(self, attr=None):    if attr is None:     attr = "_weakref_property__%d" % (id(self),)    self.attr = attr    def __get__(self, instance, owner):    if instance is None:     return self    ref = getattr(instance, self.attr, None)    if ref:     return ref()    else:     return None    def __set__(self, instance, value):    if value is not None:     value = make_weakref(value)    setattr(instance, self.attr, value)    def __delete__(self, instance):    delattr(instance, self.attr)
Take 200mg of Niacin every night before you go to bed.
what word?
I pirated both games.  Borderlands plays online perfectly off the torrent.  I originally felt guilty about pirating Torchlight, but then I played it for an hour and realized that it's not just a diablo-style game, it is an unabashed CLONE of diablo 2 with a different graphics engine.  Pretty sure they'll be sued by blizzard before too long.  Fun game though.  
I actually didn't know about that when I became a citizen. But seriously, fuck that. This is the only country in the world that does that, and that should change.   Still, I don't think I will be moving any time soon. 
Thank you for the karma. :) I am a lady, not a sir. Though there were few cues to give that away. 
God I love that city.  I go through there in streetview every once in a while just to reminisce.
:(
There's already an RPG set in modern times, it's called real life. Parodoxically, many would and would not play it at the same time.
Pfft.  I do this practically every day.
Both.  As the world becomes more globalized we're having more global institutions and organizations.  It doesn't have anything to do with the NWO or anything else Alex Jones says though. It's just the political structure of the world slowly following the socio-economic structure of this world.  Edit: I have to add that Alex Jones is probably right about how terrible this global institution it's going to be though. Humanity never had to create an institution that goes even beyond the national level so it probably won't be very pretty the first try. 
It's pretty hard, but not as hard as getting into the traditional retail system. Still hard though.
I just completely re-evaluated my position on whether shooting glasses were necessary at all times.
* Sex with demons * Orgies between animals and humans * Animal and human sacrifices * Sacrificing babies to shed innocent blood * Rape and molestation of adults, children and babies * Revel nights * Conjuring of demons and casting of spells * Release of “time-released” curses against the innocent and the ignorant.  You know what is really funny? Early Christians were accused of all these things by the pagan Romans.
John Malkovich?
He was way off with his idea for causes though.
A mad scientist called GOD.
They still do. Road Rules. Real World. Road Rules/Real World Challenge.  Programming gold, my friend.
I was wrong about the 39, it was a 32 cent Fulbright commemorative from 1996.  http://www.apnss.org/3065-11111c.jpg  Thanks for your help guys!
What I am proposing is free will and the free market in action. I can see the commercials on MTV now..... Rollin on dubs can't make no little scrubs.......it is a simple and elegant solution with zero compulsion involved.
Nice. 
It was a bit jumbled. There were many allusions to the ethnic bogan aesthetic. 
"Ay, girl, when you gonna let me tap that?"
Odd. What kind of hardware are you running? Did you try the -windowed option?
That barbaric infidel almost got what he deserved! /sarcasm
Was he dressed like Frankenstein, because that's what he looked like.
I didn't know that Rod Blagojevich could play the accordion.
Maybe try voting for someone different than R or D?  I vote libertarian, because they're the only ideology out there who actually stands for what our founding fathers did; the only people that actually believes anything different from any one else - that government isn't the solution, but individual liberties are.  (And I use libertarian with a small "l" because the American Libertarian political party does not have a monopoly on this idea - at least one Republican, Ron Paul, also seems to have adopted this same ideology.)
gay is a sexual orientation. marriage is a legally binding agreement that gives life partners certain rights.
But he's not a real doctor is he?  Let's see him perform a tracheotomy.
[TheSooley's Backpack...](http://www.tf2items.com/profiles/76561198013139090)
The houses in my target area cost $230k. WTF? Damn you (insert where I want to buy) with your clean streets, low crime, and ample parking!
Literally last week... I like to think maybe he was just waiting for his moment in the spotlight again.
scare the living shit out of trick or treaters.
The first part of that statement, that our middlish size/age/speed/energy placement would prevent us from knowing any more than the apparent rules of our immediate surroundings, would be absolutely true if we weren't both curious and capable of reason. In trying to understand the world we have developed a formal logic, parts of which we can prove to be true *absolutely* (mathematics, for instance, can be proven independently of the universe, it is unreservedly correct. I fear this is anecdotal, something I overheard a mathematician say once). Repeated observation of the universe *again and again* indicate with good confidence that the universe follows this logic. Good confidence may be an understatement: such is our confidence in the underlying logic of the universe that we're prepared to discard this view point, were we to find a single case where we can show that the universe functions illogically. Of course, there are things we don't understand yet, but lack of understanding is not tantamount to a violation of logic - and we can tell the difference.  And so, given a logical universe, we go exploring! We use our understanding of our local scales to build machines that let us peer into different ones. We're, in effect, stretching our perception across various dimensions of speed, size, age, all that, and so we traverse 35 orders of magnitude to [gaze at atoms](http://blogs.knoxnews.com/munger/2009/09/first_detailed_pics_of_single.html) and [map superclusters](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Nearsc.gif), we have [photographed an event that happened 13 billion years ago](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/sci/tech/8329865.stm), and [slowed light to a crawl](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lene_Hau).  Given the speed of humanity's development, we're *hardly* the permanent teenager - very little about us is permanent. Humanity is growing and developing *and learning* at a crazy rate.  The audacity of man to strive to *know* has brought us many, many wonders, not least of all is *knowledge*.
I cannot be caged. I cannot be controlled. Understand this as you die, ever pathetic, ever fools!
I would think Karl would have tried pulling some strings for him, since he's a mod! You gotta earn it over time though.
Yeah, Mplayer. Multiplayer Quake on that service set me down a disastrous path. I ended up wiring phonelines through the house walls, and disconnecting the USRobotics 14.4k modem speaker, to play it in secret, it was so damned addicting. The step up from 2d console games to 3d multiplayer was staggering.
I see no - AHHHHHHH GOD DAMN YOU!
I know I'm gonna get downvoted for this but...
I don't believe that there are only two in the world. If you google it, you can find places that sell them.
I have been trying. 
Not likely I tried this once and everyone asked why I didn't have a boyfriend.  Why I never got married and if I were a lesbian.  How that has ANYTHING to do with homelessness...I don't know.
Maybe they would allow 'Medical-Alcohol' for enemas.
Now that is a stretch. And also it is the same logical fallacy as in declaring there is a god.  While it is perfectly safe to assume that there are Christians that have unprotected sex (or else they wouldn't procreate, for one thing), it is preposterous to assume every single one would feel guilty over it.  Declaring that there is no god, is an induction, just as the unprotected sex claim.  Making a generalized positive claim though (about the feelings of billions of people nonetheless), is a very very dubious and shaky thing to do with a lot of burden for evidence.
Anthony Bourdain is an annoying, loud fuck head without many good restaurants. I love him, and he's absolutely right. 
&gt;First thing you notice is the "taste." When you inject certain drugs, they have a unique taste caused by the drug mixing with your blood and traveling through your taste buds.   I think I know what you mean, though I've never felt anything like it. Thanks for the description.
fcking wonderful :(
Good stuff.
I'll hide behind a smile  And understanding eyes  And I'll tell you things that you already know  So you can say  I really identify with you, so much  And all the time that you're needing me  Is just the time that I'm bleeding you  Don't you get it yet?  I'll come to you like an affliction  And I'll leave you like an addiction  You'll never forget me  You wanna know why?  Cause I'm a liar  Yeah I'm a liar  I'll rip your mind out  I'll burn your soul  I'll turn you into me  I'll turn you into me  Cause I'm a liar, a liar  Liar, liar, liar, liar   Do you like that song?
The whole point of "Bullshit" is to call out people who are liars, and quacks, and cons. But if they actually called out people as liars or quacks on the show, they'd have lawsuits all of the time because that would be libel. Calling someone a motherfucker, however, is legal. 
it's quite possible that the speaker got into her groove after the first interview on the CNN-US segment and was able to condense her reply into something more concise on the second round.   She seemed to be aimlessly US bashing on the CNN-US segment. 
why didn't you take the LSAT again
genius, lol
In the SF Bay Area they try to talk to you while you are driving around the city streets, they are annoying.  I once saw them yelling at a guy calling him a pussy for not wanting to buy their crap.  The ones that annoy me more are the "Excuse me sir, I noticed your very nice [car model name], you have a dent, I can fix that for you... blah blah blah" Mexican or Middle Eastern. 
This is hip hop at its finest.  Edit: Also the girl sing along with the song is fucking awesome/hilarious: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BxuHi_GdAwg#t=4m13s
&gt; Your costume was scary or traditional. You were a ghost, Frankenstein, Dracula, or some other spooky thing.  I was born in '85 and since then I've been Tinkerbell, a unicorn, a clown, a cheerleader, and countless other non-traditional/non-scary costumes.  Maybe it's a girl thing.
Canadian Pussy is Mighty Cold!
They only have to be right once, and unlike before 1950, we have that ability now. 
How is this different than almost any other piece of legislation for the last couple decades? Forget one old fart being computer illiterate, the whole lot of them are ignorant of just about everything important!
Everyone is against the death penalty, until it's your little sister, or daughter, who is abducted, and tortured for 10 hours and humiliated in unspeakable acts.   I have no little sister, or daughter. No one in my family has ever been seriously harmed or sadistically humiliated without mercy by anyone else. I'm against the death penalty.
Welcome to the wonderful world of blogging. You are correct that starting a blog is the perfect way to share your message with the world. Since blogs can be about most anything, you can write about the subject or subjects that interest you most. And you're right that blogs can be a great place for interaction. Best wishes for much success with your blog. Steve DeVane 
NPR had an interview with Jewish settlers not a few weeks back that covered a lot of the same ground. Settlers believing it was their sovereign right to populate the land, etc. etc.   In fact, NPR has run a number of stories on the illegal settlements just this summer alone, more than a couple had audio with the reporter confronting the settlers on their stance.   So, about that whole 'never air in the USA' thing...yeah, not so true. 
Yes! The gold is mine! I mean... I mean ours! - Battlefield Bad Company
Dude - when I was a kid we would make Buck -- which i sugar water that you add yeast to and let sit for a week or two.  It tastes like shit, but we got hammered as kids drinking that.
[It has been done](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Package_management_system#Microsoft_Windows)
I'd say this is a workable idea. I have actual experience with something like this. Spontaneous kisses, genuine and gentle (not huge slobbery wet puppy dog style) are SO nice.
So your "Schizoid Main Personality" doesn't care about anyone and if you left management of your life up to it you would probably be a bum.  Then what prompted you to develop your "Coping Personality"? Your schizoid side doesn't care enough and the coping one didn't exist.   No offense but something doesn't add up. 
AA is more like counter-strike than any supposedly "realistic" game like ArmA.  http://www.liveleak.com/view?i=33a_1256688401
&gt; Just sayin'  A bit off topic but I have a question? I've seen this phrase on occasion and I tend to interpret it as, "Just flapping my worthless gums. Pay no attention to the noise created." Why post in the first place. Am I missing something?
I like wins by Default!
If there's a part in a book that is supposed to be sneaky or quiet, I automatically get quieter and sometimes hold my breath, too.
Here i fixed it for everyone http://imgur.com/HLZ6W.gif
As if you've got problems. Try being someone who corrects English!
I wonder if H1N1 actually made some parents keep their kids in this year..
This gave me a percent score and an overall average, but it didn't say whether I'm getting enough sleep. I'd say the OP's title is misleading.
Waking up, looking at the hot person sharing your bed, and realizing you're not dreaming...or so I have been told.
So, you admit all of your conclusions are based on a false assumption? You clearly, OBVIOUSLY don't have all the facts. You'd need to court record for that.   I, personally, would not give her life in prison. But for murder I do not consider it an unacceptable outcome. Use the police. Use the existing system. Walk away. But you do not simply elect to take another person's life. Not when your life is not in *immediate* danger.
Thats not the sun thats a close up of a button on a leather seat =\
just ignore reddiquette and downvote like everybody else.
I can't think of any reason to believe anything that Timmy says.
Will you give a positive answer to this question?
Will you answer this question truthfully? 
Getting a new job, but not having to start work until next week. Best feeling ever.
I'm not so bothered by prepositions... *At least* you separated your adjectives with commas!   ahem. 
do you have paypal?
So, two people agree they can own something and then get government force to back them up? 
Honestly, you're nothing special (nor do you have some 'personality disorder'). Earth is full of idiots. Chances are 99.9% of the people you know are imbeciles. Ergo, deciding you couldn't care less for society is just a rational conclusion to make.
As will all other artists since the dawn of time...except John Denver.
&gt; ...someone pinned down and subdued.  Good point on the tasers...but, he wasn't "subdued"
My first thought too.  Also, interesting how despite language differences, you could clearly make out several "wow!"s
Gotta be honest, even 'user for ______' is starting to get on my gonads now. I'm basically anti anything that isn't relevant to the article/question.
rugby is well known for having a high amount of repressed, sadomasochist homosexuals. Who seem to find an outlet through violence, alcohol and waving their dicks at each other. 
The first blowjob
Yep! The obvious issues are the bridge and nut. The nut's pretty easy to replace, but the bridge could be more difficult - pretty much any tremolo arm is going to wind up on the wrong side, which could be an issue. Acoustics could be a little more work, but it generally doesn't cost too much for a luthier to do it. 
also, Sim Tower
ok
the original othmani manuscript still exists - that's well inside of the first century. secondly, even if no original manuscript existed, the Quran was primarly transmitted orally, yet there is no alleged claim that an early manuscript is different from the Quran that was transmitted - many people that memorize the Quran today can list for you the 30-35 names of people all the way back to the Prophet that transmitted the Quran - I believe you have a similar concept in Christianity. What part of the Quran is not authentic? What text should be included in the Quran? Those questions are very easy to answer for the bible, in fact, understanding the history of canonization could fill a library -  not so much the Quran. 
I appreciate your personal accounts and your service for America. Its nice to know what the culture is like sometimes.  Btw, I don't want to nitpick or anything, I just wanted to note/remind everyone that the "real war on terror" wasn't caused by the Iraqis or even the Afghanis in the first place.  Recent history over the past few decades has shown that America either caused the debacle or has been strongly implicated in the events leading up to 9/11.   Al Qaeda and the Taliban were created and nurtured by America. During the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan during the 1980s, Osama bin Laden’s network of foreign fighters was one of the beneficiaries of CIA and Saudi funds channelled through Pakistan’s Inter-Service Intelligence.  Now why did 9/11 happen?  Our CIA calls actions like this "blowback", meaning they are counter-attacks for our own interference in other nations' business.   example of blowback) The other most relevant incident of "blowback" btw was when we OPENLY overthrew the DEMOCRATICALLY elected prime minister of Iran Mohammed Mosaddeq in 1952 because he wanted to nationalize Iranian oil --- and in return we installed a MONARCHIC dictatorship instead. In the grand scheme of things, Iran went from a secular parliamentary democracy (which is what America ostensibly promotes), to a monarchic dictatorship (under Mohammed Reza Pahlavi), finally to a backwards, completely anti-Western nation due to American/British imperialism that prevented the development of the Iranian national oil company.The blowback was that the monarchy that we installed was then overthrown in 1979, and now Iran is in control by religious fanatics. If it wasn't for America and Britain's interests for favorable oil prices and only their own economic development and interests, it would have been very likely that Iran would be much more favorable to America today and not so openly hostile. Indeed, this [1953 Iranian Coup D'Etat](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1953_Iranian_coup_d'%C3%A9tat) by the Americans/CIA would be the primary reason why Obama has been trying to be easygoing with the Iranians (because we illegally stole their oil in essence).  Now with terrorism, it is not to say we "deserve" it, but if you tell other people how to live, they tend to push back, is all I'm saying.   Terrorism is merely a way that a weak force pushes back against a strong force that is bullying it (real or perceived bullying).   Religion, blah blah is all a smokescreen. 9-11 was a political act.  Think about it:  They didn't hit Disneyland, or the Statue of Liberty.  They hit:  1. Twin Towers --a symbol of our financial strength  2. Pentagon -- symbol of our military power  3. If they could have, the White House? which is a symbol of our government  **TLDR;**  *The US is not the benevolent influence we Americans like to mythologize. Outside the US, our influence can be quite uncaring and brutal, all in the name of national interest. The US has never been that entity, other than brief events, that was typically the result of individual actions. So the Arabs have no more reason to love the US than the Native Americans.  America, I love it but refuse to ignore the darkside.*
I don't know, but I once started hitting myself to get over a girl, ran into a pillar, broke a table and puched a wall till my hands were covered in blood.
his ass
Actually the article continues to include boys cruelly sentenced also.  "Girl kills abusive pimp" certainly gains attention better than "Very young boy rapes granny after his older buddies break into her house and rob her", though.
I had a similar experience (Mind you this is in Australia): My friend and I were sitting at a set of traffic lights. A white van pulls up and the driver asks us if we wanted to buy a pair of speakers. He said that his boss gave him too much and he was just trying to get rid of stock. The passenger of the white van then reaches behind him to open the side door so we could see. We said sure and agreed to pull into the next street to have a closer look. Traffic light turned green, they pulled in to the next street, we kept going straight, never to see them again. 
I wipe it on people when they aren't looking.
Good advice.  Humans are, in some ways, so predicable and easily manipulated.  Sure there are exceptions, but I've seen this work so many times and have felt the effect myself, it's pretty amazing.  Most recently, I've been broken up with my gf for about 3 months.  The relationship had fatal issues and breaking up was for the best, and I felt no desire to get it back, nor was I still in love with her.  Boom, she starts dating a new guy, suddenly I miss her.
I feel that.
&gt;  because there are people that feel a need to be superior to another class of people  I think you mean that there are now people with the courage to speak up against those things that are turning Australia into a shithole in the name of nationalism.
I think about this myself, but I always come back to this quote by Cormac McCarthy from one of his only interviews:  &gt;"I think the notion that the species can be improved in some way, that everyone could live in harmony, is a really dangerous idea. Those who are afflicted with this notion are the first ones to give up their souls, their freedom. Your desire that it be that way will enslave you and make your life vacuous."
Pix or it didnt happen
Dickweed.
Because the zone represents a continuously varying duration of daylight. The lines represent those (latitude, time-of-year) pairs at which the amount of daylight is an exact multiple of 1 hour.
If someone said that to me I would make fun of them so much...
I unfortunately agree with you.  No matter how viral the internet is, it will just be one part of exposing the fraud that is Christianity, Islam, Judaism, etc.  The day Christianity is broken will be an historic day for our species.
Much as I dislike Cheney (and that's a lot), article does not appear to corroborate the summary above at all. There's a whole lotta "Dick says he doesn't remember the crazy stuff he did" but no hard evidence of anything new.
I got [Slutty George](http://images.quickblogcast.com/45517-41451/costanza.jpg).
I have some salomon twin tips (1080's). Rarely used. If you are newer to the sport like you suggest then you will probably enjoy these. 
The gentle touch at 1:00 is really impressive.
You're ma favourite Nigga. 
Sorry, how will you answer my question?
or in a hot tub...
No. But I think it's good commentary and wanted to convey my opinion to the commentator. I appreciated the humorous device found in the repetition of the theme of your sarcasm and wonder if the comment would have been more humorous had the commentator taken my criticism to heart and rephrased per my suggestion. E.g. "Damn, are you a professional comment critic?". 
i started as a cook in the place, restaurant downstairs, club upstairs.  I got along well with the nightclub manager, so when i was going back to school and needed a night job, it was just a matter of sitting down with him.  To be a bartender however...you'd have to 1. be female 2. have huge tits.
"I looked down at the worn Obama campaign pin in my hand. It read "Hope". As my car idled motionless, I cried."  ...sometimes, being able to say "I told you so" isn't very satisfying.
[original story](http://www.reddit.com/r/Libertarian/comments/9ziea/jury_activist_arrested_for_exercising_first/)
Who does he think he is? Buck Rogers?
Plot.
I'd go with the typical "No Gods, No masters", but there's a quote I like particularly, but it's not anarchist per se... as che guevara was more of a socialist:   "There are no impossible things, only incapable men"  (well the original is "No hay cosas imposibles, sino hombres incapaces"). It inspires me to think that anarchism is not impossible.   Another nice quote I like:   “La palabra es el germen de la revolución y sus ramas son nuestra imaginación, de las que salen las hojitas que son la vida y la intuición”.  César Rivas Camacho  I'll translate it as: "Words are the germ of revolution, and the its branches are our imagination, out of which leaflets grow – which are life and intuition".   And in a desperate bid for a wave invite... another one from thomas jefferson!   "An honest man can feel no pleasure in the exercise of power over his fellow citizens." - Thomas Jefferson.  Not necessarily anarchist authors but their message very much is. 
&gt;I consider myself to be a monarchist. Canada has so precious little history, and it would be a shame, I think, to throw away such a pivotal aspect of that past.  I hate that argument. There's a world of difference between erasing history and actively maintaining the practices of the past. It's like saying slavery shouldn't have been abolished because it was so central to culture before the 20th century.
They're empty front operations not real businesses. All they do is send bills to Medicare without delivering any wheel chairs or prosthetic limbs etc. They just fill in the codes, send for payment, get the money in their accounts, shut the business down like after a month or two and open up the next front operation.
So the idea of success is objective?
sans slaves
Well, forgive me, but if you don't know that for(;;) is an infinite loop then you don't know C very well. That is extremely common, even if while(1) is a little more popular.
For 5 bucks i would love to hear him speechify. I imagine a scene like the Pilate speech in [The Life Of Brian](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ik0cqxJElqA&amp;feature=related) (about 2:10 in)
Pretty much all of the comments here make sad. 
I wouldn't, for a simple reason:  I don't smoke pot, but I do drink alcohol.
I think what he's saying is that the GDP numbers are meaningless given the current situation and how it is calculated.
Especially a peanut butter and dorito sandwich.  Have you tried one -- it is fucking delicious!
If any of them were to wash ashore during a divorce hearing, however, you would be royally fucked. 
I doubt it.  You should read the Torah--their god is a real dick....oh wait a second...
&gt;That's a respectable assertion.  cthulhufhtagn receives the "Actually Following Reddiquette" award.  I have to say, whether I agree or disagree with you, I've enjoyed following your comments through these Halloween topics.
It is easy to exist and hard as hell to have a life...you are so right..  People never understand the difference at all.  It's as if magic fairies provide everything to some people and when you can't live the same way...BAM they shut the door.  I lost a lot of friends simply because I couldn't keep in contact while moving around constantly.  Oddly enough all my homeless friends are still buddies and a lot of them got out.  The rest are dead or prostitutes.  I hate to say it.
You look like a fiend we use to call Trolio.
There's also [Redshift Rendezvous](http://www.neverend.com/excrptrr.htm): A novel set aboard a ship in a hyperspace where the speed of light is ten meters per second. I've only read the (lengthy) excerpt provided on that page, but based on it, the novel seems like an awesome hard science fiction piece.
I've always thought it went: human -&gt; vampire.  Not human -&gt; corpse -&gt; vampire.
Mask! How seasonal.   The's getting with the spirit of gw.  Good work.
The hole you're digging just gets deeper and deeper.
Downvoted. For the love of god.
Just because there are more broke-ass teenage punks who know how to use BT doesn't mean that there are less adults with money in their wallets.
Love that game! Currently playing it.
&gt; corking is a bit empowering  Some guy in an Olds tried to go around me! He backed up 10 ft and tried to go around me, with 100 more bikers on their way. Within seconds we had 4 other bikers surrounding him. It was great.
exactly. listening to the crazies go on about how we have a two headed beast will be much more effective for you at this young age instead of falling for some fairytale. 
` `
RTFA.
How to eat them? I think you've already got the right idea. Also excellent with good old fish and chips.
He can do whatever He feels will maximize His glory.  The argument is that by using us to fix the world, God's glory will be maximized.  Therefore, God uses our resources to fix the world.  Does this make sense?
Bonus points if there's a snowstorm outside.
Was anyone else disappointed by the lack of an actual google.com/tricks or google.com/treats page?
If you get the VPN software doesn't it just log you in automatically?
I upvoted with the power of a thousand galaxies. 
Weird, first thing I searched was Quantum Mechanics. This is actually very useful for complex things like that.
Guy Fawkes and his chums were Catholic conspirators though so the modern equivalent would be Islamic extremists blowing up Parliament, not a symbolic V figure of freedom.
Ketchup and cheese man! What do you Americans do? Deep fry it in lard then cover it in chocolate? :)
I saw videos of TF2 and everything, I just didn't know it was already on the market. I thought it was another duke nukem forever.
How much do you make?
Yes.
I wish I could trade for some right now!
You need a tl;dr summary of all that, bro.
Yeah because there are only 3 subreddits.   This isnt about science. This isnt even science news. This is about the texas board of education and their textbooks. Would you ever see this article in a science journal or magazine? 
Adblock plus (firefox plugin) actually does a fair job at keeping a lot of malware away. Noscript is excellent as well, but the user needs to be informed enough to only allow safe domains. There's a risk he could mess it up.  Honestly? I'd put linux on there. His flash with suck and he won't be able to download 'jenniferlopez.exe'.
Previously enjoyed!
I kinda like how completely blatant and honest it is. Curious how various media that use sex and violence to attract audience fly completely under the radar and then this one which is simply the same thing without a veil over its head gets blasted. Suspension of disbelief? People have to justify to themselves of enjoying the baser instincts.  This almost constitutes as modern art IMHO.  P.S. I very much appreciate both cynicism and the postmodernism of the self-acknowledged blatant exploitation of the lowest common denominator.
I have never called someone without something to talk about in mind.
MTV skateboarding for dreamcast.
I wish it was real.  At least then we might have some hope against the cretinous tide of human failure that is engulfing civilization.
Arpaio is a disgusting person who belongs in prison. He's a scumbag who has long terrorized people under the broad protection of a star. He's everything a good law enforcer is not. Idiots have habitually idolized him for his bullshit "ask no questions, take many prisoners" stance, and it's our fault that we don't hold them just as accountable for their unwillingness to ask questions about the folks who purport to keep us safe. A great justice will occur if he's indicted and sent away for a long, long time. He's a criminal among the innocents he's criminalized.
Your comment is complete and utter nonsense; mere words strung together in a semblance of argument but on any inspection totally devoid of any meaning whatsoever.  However I will speak to those who downmodded my original comment. The idea that the hijab is a "symbol of female oppression" is a lazy bit of propaganda, and anybody who agrees with it isn't actually thinking for themselves. It is only "a symbol" in the West, where the wearing of headscarves hasn't been the cultural norm for, maybe, fifty years. But hey, what about those headscarves that the Amish women wear - that means that they are oppressed, right?  If you label the hijab as a "symbol" of "oppression" of women, it says more about you than it does about them. It means that you are willing to accept lazy arguments about Muslims. Hell, the fact that the word "symbol" is in there means that is basically *isn't true*.
GODLIKE.
&gt;stepped foot  Is "stepped foot" the american version of set foot? http://idioms.thefreedictionary.com/set+foot+in
Seriously fuck this shit. There is nothing *nothing* you can do to make someone love you. Nothing. You have absolutely no control over other people's feelings. So stop beating this dude up. 
Chamberlain, your appeasement will be the death of us all!
If you make shroom juice or shroom tea, fasting is less important since the psilocybin is already extracted into the liquid and easily absorbed by the digestive tract. 
FTFY
What's scary about stonehenge?
My brother was suspended for a week for something similar.  He, in elementary school, was supposed to make a clay figure of a character from some literary work.  He did the caterpillar from "Alice in Wonderland."   Drug reference, suspension. Go figure.
I'm sorry, what did you glean from his comment? That you should reinstall windows or not use it at all?  Of course if you have a root kit you are going to have files coming back from the dead. Perhaps if the conversation went in this direction instead of *"just throw it all out"* ...
I offer to buy a burger from a local restaurant whenever I'm asked for cash in the area by my college. Helps to identify those who are truly hungry and those who are spinning a sob story for drug money. 
Son of a
Fuuuuuck yes. You have a grand time- I've got good freinds, cookie cake and a fat sack of shrooms! Happy Halloween!
Not more than five. Twenty years ago we routinely got 150 or more. All those kids grew up. No young families have moved into the neighborhood. Too bad, really. It was a lot of fun.
I can't remember.
Or, if he wants to be ever more saavy --- he can look at his porn in a linux live cd. No tracks to erase.
For a complete overhaul like this keep in mind that bikes use all sorts of special tools that are required to take parts off and put them on. Which are expensive. Or you can try and find someone or someplace that would let you use their tools. In Minneapolis, where I'm at, there's a bike charity where you can use their tools and there is also a LBS that has a community workshop.   There are also all sorts of sizes that need to be consistent. For example, BB shell diameter vs. BB size and distance between the rear drop outs vs. rear hub size. Also the size of the holes where the brakes mount on the frame in older road bikes is usually smaller than the current standard.   However, the rear drops outs can be cold set a couple of mm. In your case I'm guessing it would be 126mm to 120mm which should be fine. The brake mounts on the frame can also be widened to accept the current 5mm standard. I would have your LBS do both of these things if you need them. I needed to have my rear brake mount widened but not the front but I've seen bikes from that era that needed both or neither. 
Which would be more efficient?  1. File their teeth down  2. Apply electric shock  3. Snap fingers one by one
I won't do it for Jesus, but I will do it for Dawkins.
Yes, I'm answering it truthfully.
o...m...g.... wow.   I love the outfit.  You're a very good looking woman!  I've had a D/s/BDSM fetish for as long as I can remember now..always nice to see some up here on reddit.  You single? ^_^*  EDIT*: I only ask, because it's expected of us male lurkers on here to ask.
Yes, we have a say. We vote, dumbass.
do vegan's swallow?
None can stop the Crusade of the Righteous.  -Dawn of War 2, Gabriel Angelos  or  _ELDAR ARE FRAGILE CREATURES._  -Davian Thule (Dreadnought), Dawn of War 2
What are your thoughts about Guantanamo Bay and "advanced interrogation techniques"? What are your personal morals and ethics like, and have they ever come in to conflict with what you were ordered / expected to do? Do you believe in personal responsibility? Have you done anything you regret doing? 
the dude. you just need a bath-robe, joint and a white russian.
Spencer Thomas slays pandas!
With pure truth.
"All-Star" - Smash Mouth.  The year was 1999.  IRC, baby.  I was one of the first people I knew to have MP3s and be able to burn "mix" CDs.  Before that we had some sort of electronic sound thing that was Beevis and Buthead doing "TP For My Bunghole".  Good times.
Econ is just an abbreviation. Math(s) is a word in it's own right too. Of course abbreviations can still maintain their plurality for example stats.
Humor me with an odd question: Do you have an odd shaped nose? 
SWEET!
I upvoted you, but I think bitch is a harsh term. What I gathered is that she did not have the emotional intelligence to be honest that she wasn't interested. Easier to ignore. 
I read that in NYC, boxes are very valuable due to wide spread use of this scam.
I also think the kind of person that gives is highly empathetic, and so they understand other people when they ask for help, but at the same time might not want to put someone in an uncomfortable position by asking for the same favour.
I'm really proud to be Irish but when it comes to religion I hang my head in shame...
Somebody downloaded a YouTube-Video by capturing the screen. This is truely WTF.
you sound like most Computer Science majors i know
This is the next best thing on Earth for Democrats.  The best thing on Earth will be if Doug Hoffman wins.  That will send a message to the Republican Party that extreme right-wing candidates are the key to electoral dominance, and it will field an Army of Mars of fringe crazies in 2010 and 2012, ensuring continued Democratic control of House, Senate, and White House at the very least.  Go Pubs!
fyi, there is no point in blacking out your name, and leaving the url to your facebook page visible.
&gt;When I went through that exercise, I thought, "Gee, what a fucking coincidence that the age of the universe is identical to the distance to a galaxy that is receding from us at the speed of light  ...divided by the speed of light. (I apologize for the pedantry)
Will you answer this question?
It is true though, believe if you want. You are also not the first "american" who says "you lie" when he hears/reads something he doesn't like.   If you are still the richest country, it won't be for much longer. Enjoy while it lasts :D.  Into oblivion it goes.
It just keeps getting better and then it stops :-(. It really picks up though sometime around second season.
No. I'm not white
She was young and poor and has been in prison for more than half her adult life now.  Sure, she may eventually get to appeal and maybe win it, but she'll never get over half of her life back.
[Lisztomania](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RrbGpvOulec&amp;feature=player_embedded) gets me going every time.
You forgot to censor the title bar, the URL, and your own name.
This is why I rarely answer my phone.   I don't want to converse on the phone, I want to get and give essential information: "I'm on my way, be there in ten minutes." "I need an appointment." "I've got a restraining order, and I hope you die in a fire."
Those aren't stick legs. You can tell because he has a solid arm. You can't mix the two.
You're wrong and any educated, reasonable or worldly person knows it.  You may not like being wrong, and in fact, I am sure you will become even more rigid in your conviction, wrong as it is, and go on doing more harm to the cause you wish to support by doing so.  Which is regrettable, because it makes the job of those of us who truly wish to see a free and secure Palestine that much harder. 
I'd return it....but drive 150 miles to another police department...if no one claimed it...it's alll mine!
Wow, you look fantastic!  love the bondage look!  Would love to see more sometime!
made me literally LOL.
I wish i could upvote the 'light touch' thing more than once... that is so awesome.
Hello..I have a program that cost 0 cent Absolutely 0  To Join and make Money. All that you do is surf 10  ADS a day for 10 Sec EA..The company provide  the  ads to surf.  You make money by telling all the people that you can.  The more the better.  ALL FREE!
Reznor isn't worth a shit anymore anyway. Probabaly the absolute worst live performance there is on the road. 
Why bother swallowing again?
1. wtf is going on here? 2. how do i get invited?
It *is* escapist fantasy to imagine that the sort of individualism that Rand posits is even possible. Those who find her philosophy appealing are for the most part ignoring the many ways in which they themselves rely on others. Responsibility for oneself is one thing, but to suggest that by expecting *others* to be solely responsible for themselves we can shirk our own responsibilities to the larger society is an entirely different thing. And I think that's where Rand's philosophy ultimately leads us.
I saw an ad in the local denver newspaper for a stereo tech, more or less...installation of home stereo systems. This was in fact something that we tried to offer as an upsell, but the ad is totally misleading, obviously.
Is that you, Danny?
Luckily, we're judged by how much bling you have and whether or not you get on TV.
It never looked real to me:  http://www.healthandbeauty.net.au/images/andre-agassi-mullet1.jpg
Jude Law kinda did too:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HXnZZWO2Uq4
CONSTRUCT ADDITIONAL PYLONS.
Yikes.
Why do you say those are not "the Bahamas?"
Does anyone have a link to atheism images or literature that I can print and hand out?
Imagine how much they could charge if you got to kick him in the balls. I'd pay at least a grand for that...
Disc brakes are not [uci legal](http://www.uci.ch/includes/asp/getTarget.asp?type=FILE&amp;id=34033), section 1.3.025, so cantilevers it is.
I can't seem to make up my mind, should I go as a Slutty [Wyszowatka](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wyszowatka) or a Slutty [LAPA FA-03](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LAPA_FA-03)?
Hell yeah I would! I'd like to see more traditional RPGs in general. The gaming industry has really been falling short of substance and churning out lots of flashy graphics and poorly-controlled FPSs. It's a real shame.  As for the modern setting I play a lot of World of Darkness RPGs (the pen and paper kind) and I think that an RPG set in modern times could do really well.
The Monarchist League of Canada put out [this report](http://www.monarchist.ca/new/docs/cc2009.pdf) (PDF) about how much the monarchy costs. It's pretty interesting.  It boils down to about $1.53 per capita.  As an American, I'd pay $1.53 to have a monarchy like you guys.  :P
I reckon I could get away with feigning ignorance/coincidence - but you... no, you've implicated yourself.
Texture, depth, value. You've got good handwork, the examples [here](http://www.oldbookillustrations.com/) may help with inspiration.
"It is time for more...experiments!" 
Dunno.  Last I heard he shot up a shit load of speed balls and bit the dust.  Of course, I have had reports of deaths before that were totally exaggerated.  I like to think ***that*** since the last time I saw him he was clean and he was very against drugs.  He was a punk rocker living from one day to the next.  He probably still is.  
Like i said, he is one term congressman and Florida will not put up with a left coast liberal. Watch and see. I love the hypocrites thought that defend this moonbat yet praise people for attacking Joe Wilson and Rush Limbaugh. Then attack fox news and praise MSNBC as if it is legitimite news. Say bye bye to Grayson and you can praise him and worship the messiah all you want. I refuse to drink the koolaid. I'm not a GOP man i am a libertarian but good luck with your sad attempt at a verbal assault. 
Please tell more stories like this.
NO IT IS NOT. SHUT UP. YOU SPEAK LIES.
So you've encountered real zombies in Iraq?  It is the cradle of civilization after all.  Which zombie movie is the most realistic?  I got a family to protect you know...
Nah, they should be more worried any time the bastards are alone with them.
someone tried to pull that over on me when i lived in orlando.  the thing that really tipped me off is they approached me in the parking lot after i walked out of the bank.
Ya, the other day I was out gathering maple syrup, and some rough looking kids with hockey sticks ganged up on me and kicked snow in my face. One kid was wearing a goalie mask, with the Montreal-Canadians logo, and really freaked me out. I went home and watched 5 hours of Anne of Green Gables, and Corner-Gas, and drank a case of Molson-X, just to calm my nerves.  If only the police officers in Prince-Edward-Island were allowed to carry guns, and we had the death penalty, those kids would have known to behave themselves.  Back in 1998, I heard someone broke into my neighbor Steve's place, and stole Canadian-Back-Bacon out of his fridge (along with all his Labatt-Blue bottles). Things are gettin' rough up here. Ain't what it used to be. 
Duh.
it's already been said, but, if she's bad enough to cheat on you, you're better off without her for good. Don't make the mistake of going back to her after "she realized what she'd done". Even if she feels that way, people don't change that quickly.
That was different, but I like this movie scene better.  All parties should be this much fun if everyone could just forget themselves for a bit.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hhbYxXg7p-A
'Circlejerk' and 'hivemind.'  Those two comments are the refuge of anyone who wants to disagree with anything remotely mainstream.  Also, comments that predict an onslaught of downvotes. That's so fucking lame, it's a pathetic technique to make one's comment seem edgy and non-conformist. It feels like they're trying to guilt you into not downvoting. 
"Shake it baby"
&gt;but apparently you're too dumb to figure that out.  You really shouldn't say "too dumb to figure that out" when I have to repeat to you once more that I wanted a method which did not require the familiarity with specific objects or specific cultural knowledge and twice now you posted "Let's assume that" and referred to specific objects and have still failed to find a method for me to differentiate between the two directions.  Having said all this, I'm in Israel, half the time the books are given with the spine on one side or another.  Guess I'll never know what is left and what is right. :(
Nice headline brohan. Is this a story about a religious zealot Israeli settler or complaints about the U.S. media? Bonus points for putting chocolate in my peanut butter.
I do that when I sleep. I can't physically cry. I haven't been able to in years.
Oh you should go to AMA reddit and answer questions.
[original story](http://www.examiner.com/examiner/x-26370-Libertarian-News-Examiner~y2009m10d28-Jury-activist-arrested-for-exercising-First-Amendment-rights)  [fija](http://www.fija.org) activist [julian heicklen](http://www.personal.psu.edu/jph13/Freedom.html) was handing out jury nullification literature at the us district court of manhattan when approached by federal marshals and us dept. of homeland security officers and told he needed a permit.
why?
Somebody sounds angry...
It happens-eth.
HADOUKEN!  ~RYU
WTF?
"I didn't have those terms and conditions upon signing up for my service. "  Ya you did. You really should read through those things.  The TOS for Comcast doesn't even guarantee that you will even get service in the first place.  As for,  is it legal.  Its their internet, they can do what they want with it.  No one is forcing you to use it.
this is clearly the correct answer. anything else is pure insanity.
That's great, but since it isn't an official app, how does that get more developers to take advantage of it? One shouldn't have to hack a device to get more functionality out of it.
You're better off. She sounds like a nightmare. 
I only have one image from this point in the night... I'm on the ground, lying sideways next to the sidewalk, like I just tripped and ate shit, looking up at my blind date... and I just remember her screaming: "YOU DON'T REMEMBER MY NAME?!?!?!"
From the outside, that is the ugliest cruise ships I've ever seen. It looks like an apartment building on water.
That is a an idiom you should be familiar with if you are a C programmer. I've seen it before and have even used it a couple times. It can be a little weird and you can sometimes accomplish the same thing with an extra goto but it's not as horrible as the author makes it out to be.
 I'm not a probability mathematician, and I'll venture a guess to say you aren't either. Though it seems some of these scenarios cannot have a probability assigned to them because there are too many unknown variables, many seem unlikely to occur in the next 150 years, and some (such as [various ill effects caused by climate change](http://www.newscientist.com/search?query=climate+change&amp;fromdate=&amp;todate=&amp;rbauthors=&amp;rbissueno=&amp;resultview=keyword)) seem more likely. My assumption about humanity's demise stems from the fact that there is no evidence in all of Earth's history that any species has ever avoided extinction long enough to survive among the stars, which we would require in order to avoid a number of serious threats. [It doesn't seem as though we're the smartest species to have ever walked the Earth](http://hubpages.com/hub/Boskops-An-Extinct-Human-Species-That-Was-Smarter-Than-Us). [We certainly aren't the most kind](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bonobo). So *why* are we going to be an exception?
Sounds Amerikan.
Now you have to.  In adhering to societal norms, it would be unacceptable for you to back out on a **Double Dog Dare**.  Furthermore, it was would altruistic in the sense that it could allow the other schizoids to absorb your research and further it which, if you were to keep in contact with your schizoid audience, would ultimately be beneficial for you. 
This.
If you don't care, then don't post. It's that simple.
omg...your upvote button is so broken now
&gt; i still love and trust google. yes, i do, at least as much as i love and trust my bank or my grocery store.  &gt;  &gt; but... how much power can one company have before it starts to drift into evilness? It already has. You just don't notice because they don't expose the evil side to the general public. Become an advertiser with them, and you'll find their evil side. Cut a campaign that isn't performing well, without raising spending on other campaigns, and they'll punish you by cutting traffic to a completely unrelated campaign of yours that is doing well. They are like a cross between telemarketers and Microsoft on the evil scale, if you are dealing with them as a search ad selling company.
[Two Weeks](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2cZfzch8vDo) by Grizzly Bear
maybe the downvoters figure the pic needs to be less tame and more gonewild.  It is somewhat tame, after all.  No cunnilingus shot. :-(
"FINISH HIM" - Mortal Kombat
A few months ago I decided to revisit that game.  I played it when it first came out on 56k and I was like 14 or something, I was awful and got raped constantly.  I figured that since I'm pretty good at other RTS games now, I'd do OK but.... jesus.  I don't think I've ever won a game of starcraft unless it's LAN with people I know who are bad too.
:( I always feel terrible. To me for that split second the bus driver becomes worse than Hitler.
Except not at all.  The prisoner's dilemma is when there are two people that are caught together and, usually, the full scope of their activities are unknown.  This allows you 2 options with 3 outcomes: Talk before the other and taking a lighter sentence but forcing the other to take a harsher or don't talk in hopes of sharing a mediocre sentence and hoping that he doesn't talking forcing you into a harsh sentence. This person just told on him to get a lighter sentence, no dilemma.  Just someone who isn't living by his chosen professions social code.
This just in! sending hyper children out to run and play decreases their energy.  In other breaking news. Fat asses lose weight by getting off the couch and eating less fast food
That guy is totally lying, or his management team was different from mine.  edit: or if it took him that long to figure out it was a scam, I'm kind of shocked.
None of this requires the Axiom of Choice. The only choice Bob ever has to make is to choose a number within a given range ( a[n], b[n-1] ). This is simple, and can be made purely mechanical by always choosing, for example, ( a[n] + b[n-1] ) / 2. We can give an algorithm for making this choice, we don't need an axiom to tell us it is possible :).
There's also the trade of between traveling or paying off your mortgage (if you have one).
Or you can have a totally awesome Java applet that lets you input every bit of info like lat-long and time and it calculates your daylight chart for you (I've had it bookmarked since 2007) http://www.jgiesen.de/daylight/ Scroll down for instructions and features.
The first thing I have to say is I admire you for being willing to take a hard look at yourself, and ask this question.  Many people would just conclude that if others don't like them, it must be some flaw in THEIR personalities.  Second, though, I have to say that I don't think it's possible for anyone who has never met you to answer this question with any certainty.  There are probably as many possible answers to this as there are personality types.  To really make some progress on this problem as you perceive it, you really should talk to a therapist.
No thanks.  Last time people seemed to think I should have put out to get off the street.
Lots of players don't like other players who even hint at having cheat codes.  eventually they gang up on you and call what you do evil.  some people have problems with the mere idea of a "Reality Distortion Field", for example.
Hello everyone I thought of making a unique memory gift for Michael Jackson. If anyone has thought, comment, or feelings they wish to tell the tale of the pop star king, now is your chance!
I know what you were saying, and I'm sure that it is happening a lot. You still can't blame it on Medicare as many around here do. 
My wife and I are not having kids.  
This is where the cars live!
What's your source for the correlation? I haven't seen anything but anecdotes and hypotheses. I won't deny that it's plausible, but it's also awfully convenient to tell the victims of intolerance that they brought it on themselves.  Here's my hypothesis: these bigots don't like brown people, black people, yellow people... and probably don't like posh white people either. They're thugs.
I loled.
Israel would veto any motion in the UN condemning US violations of human rights, so the point is moot. 
Direct electrical stimulation of the ventral tegmental area.
Said last weekend to an old friend who excitedly told me he bought a house: "You can afford a house??"  I make more money than him, and I felt pretty bad later.
Ask him how he feels about the doctrine of "Tahara HaNeshek" (purity of arms) in light of the Gaza campaign.  
Accounting.
third verse...same as the first...
Not particularly.
Upvote for not making feeling alone in the world, then looking at your name reminding me that in fact *I am* horribly alone in this dark endless maddening abyss that is the universe of horrors my human mind was never meant to know.
Oh.. I thought you were a robot..
Spotted Dick is a sweet pudding (dessert). Yes, black pudding... if you can get over the horror of the main ingredient.
That's when you lie to them to entertain yourself. I'm a missionary philanthropist that visits the South African country of Xanadu where I give nutritional teaching to tribal peoples for charity. 
You seem to be unaware that women are a significant part of the human population. We're not a breed of dog. I have met more than my fair share of emotionally needy and useless men.
Yeah, I used to work in a cafe here in vancouver BC (which has an outrageous homeless problem), and this guy came in asking all the customers for change so he could buy coffee.  I offered to just give him a cup so he could leave my customers alone but he got all pissed off and said "I'm not going to buy it here!" and left.  It's much better to give folks food.  Especially here (and a lot of other places, too), there's a massive addiction problem--mostly heroin and crack--and the majority of people who ask for money for food aren't going to buy food. 
Yeah ! then 40% of all the people that signed on to a US server would automatically be in prison! what a cool GAME!!!
I've spoken with apes more polite than you. 
Nope
Vegan: an ideology which people try to be good to all living things. So, depending the circumstance a vegan may wear leather but it would be highly unlikely.  Strict vegetarian: Avoids consuming meat or animal products for personal or health reasons. A strict vegetarian may wear leather if their paradigm allows.
Appropriate username, herr Fritzl.
Don't invade Russia in the winter.
Thank god nobody uses that Nextel Walkie Talkie shit anymore, BLEEP - WHAT DO YOU WANT? BLEEP BLEEP - KGKCKDCBIVUBEBCV B   BLEEP - WHAT?   BLEEP BLEEP - HGVYTVTURCOMNU*I^G   ad infinitum
Nocturne No. 2 in E Flat is amazing, I am just listening to it and i'm in a bit of a sad mood lately, and the song brings up images of sad scenes...
No, I refuse to answer it.
As long as prisons are in the domain of private industry, all forms of prohibitions of 'moral' crimes will remain.  It is for this reason that all prisons must be under the sole burden of the people, and never an avenue for profit. Completely state owned and operated prisons are a buden on the tax payer and nearly impossible for a legislature to get kickbacks from.  
Just wait until till you start noticing the effects of age. Until then keep off my damn lawn.
As much as I &lt;3 OSS, this website isn't really focused on design. It's definitely very usable, but it's not 'pretty', I guess.
Interesting story, but you need to get your definitions straight.  YOU are part of society, the government is NOT society.
That's true, good thing science never claims to know anything 100% and therefore never settles on anything!
Are you replying in the right thread? This has nothing to do with the comic.
Except for I'm not pointing out vagaries. The Bible very clearly teaches that the Old Testament laws should not be followed. There are large portions of the New Testament dedicated to fighting against the idea that the Old Testament laws (including the entire book of Galatians). Jesus clearly and intentionally broke the laws. And there have been no major Christian groups since the early first century that held that the Old Testament laws should be kept. You're actually the one taking a vague passage and saying that it is the final word. After all, the passage you are quoting hardly has the clear meaning you seem to think it has. Especially when you don't take it out of context.  The Greek word for "fulfill" in verse 17 can also (and probably should be) translated "make perfect." So, is Jesus saying he is coming to fulfill the law, in that he is making sure that people follow it? Not likely seeing as he went on to blatantly break it time after time after time- I don't think that there is any reason to believe the Biblical writers would wish to portray him as a hypocrite. Or is he possibly coming to make the Old Testament laws, which were far from perfect, perfect? Was he coming to change them in some way? This is much, much more likely seeing as immediately after he makes the statement you quoted, he goes on to totally discount a number of Old Testament laws and turn them on their heads. When he condones those who break the commandments in v. 18, he may be refering to the Law which he made a very brief refrence to in v. 17. However, I find it much more likely that he is refering to the new law which he is immediately going to spend a long time expounding on.
Not as much as the cleanup costs for the TP, egging and bags of flaming poo poo left for the people at your brother's cul de sac.
It might be more stable, but it's also much more sucky.
Fuck that noise. I hate that comment.
In case you can't tell from the thumbnail, it's Lemonparty.
Yes, they have law to back them up.  I didn't say that I don't believe in law.  For that matter, I didn't say that I don't believe in "Government".  I simply believe that government is inefficient and we should all strive to minimize that which does not help us as a country.  Read every comment in this thread and you will a mention of greed in government, well perhaps we should try our best to minimize this. I suspect you were about to tell me there would be no police in my world.  Its sad to me that your understanding of Libertarianism is that.   There are better ways to do the jobs that need to be done than through Government.  
I am pretty confused by that clip. Is the whole thing like 4chan got together and made a movie?
go to trader joe's and try their bacon. their bacon has no added nitrates, only natural ones. 
I can only imagine the looks on their faces when they realized what the x-ray was actually showing.
You can click 'permalink' then click 'parent'. Two clicks I know, but hopefully not too strenuous. Certainly easier than adding &amp;context=n or scrolling through the whole comment page.
&gt;*Not so smart with your brain outside your head, are you?*
 This article is helpful for people who want to take online surveys.
Yeah, that's what I figured, for some reason it just confused me.
&gt; Commercial licenses are about $20 per installation, which is a lot of money for a single library. Hey, good documentation (evidently) doesn't write itself. :)
[I see](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/9p1u0/iama_29_year_old_that_has_been_on_her_own_off_and/). That is pretty bad. I guess you could try again maybe change the title to "I was homeless for four years" once you get 20 upvotes on it you'll start getting better questions.
it wouldn't be that easy to hide a bottle of jagermeister between my balls..
Again, this design is very usable and it definitely does the job, but it's not something that is making me say 'wow, that's a work of art'.
Your problem there is "universally accepted". What you mean is "universally accepted by scientists", which in Texas means "suspicious experts".
Because many law schools will hold the fact that you took it twice against you.  Also, repeat takers have their scores averaged, so if they receive a 150 the first time and a 160 the second time, they are considered as having received a 155.  Under these circumstances, it wasn't worth it to me.
Right. Because here at reddit, we never talk about corporate money and lobbyists and stuff like that. (That was sarcasm, just in case you missed it.)
Hehe, you really are drawn to harsh environments, Edinburgh's lovely, though, I've been a few times (I live in my own semi-harsh environment on the Irish west coast).... good luck with everything and we really would like an IamA if you ever get time..... we'll be gentle!
Especially clandestinely.  All you need for alcohol is some juice and a cupboard.  Weed takes closet space, ventilation, a medium, a big ass light, and regular maintenance.  If you can do it outdoors that's another thing, but most people don't have that luxury.  It's a real hassle.
Are Duke Ellington and Count Bassie going to pay a nigger?  Damn!  Sucker-ass nigger got no sense of perspective.
Oh lighten up, you guys.  I'm sure he teaches real math to his students every regular class.  It would have made my day if I had a math teacher do this!
we can dream.
There's a new Parasite Eve game coming for the PSP.
You could consider buying an irrigation water meter for watering gardens and trees. It costs a couple of hundred but will pay for itself in saved sewer fees.  
OMG I HAVE THAT SAME SHIRT  edit: CAN I HAVE A CAR?
&gt;"Trick or treat" meant "candy, please". If someone did a trick you would be pissed and vow not to come back until next year.  Where I'm from trick or treat was a threat from us. As in, "give us a treat or we will play a trick on you." 
***I AM DEFENDING MYSELF IN FAVOR OF THAT***
I beg to differ.
I blame myself for their relationship failing.
It's okay to have sex.
I've had luck contacting the mods of individual forums when this happens and they corrected it for me. 
No, but I don't think I'd have a problem the second time through.
drainage!
I LARPed prison for 6 months, count me out.
Putting on a brand new pair of socks. **bonus:** putting on a brand new pair of socks when you're on mdma
Try [Ndroi](http://androinica.com/2009/02/05/turn-your-g1-into-a-wi-fi-hotspot-with-ndroi/).
Yours takes the cake, but I have to tell mine...  Back in the day, my parents neighborhood has a halloween arms race. People would convert their garages into big Halloween sets. One guy really went over the top and created an evil scientist's lab complete with Jacobs Ladders and other cool looking electrical shit. And he had what looked to be the "experiment" strapped into a chair holding the candy bowl. He'd wait for some poor kid to get real close and jump up and scare the shit out of them. One kid was **not** thrilled with this, swung his bag of candy and roshamboed him with passion. Poor guy had to go inside for the rest of the night...
Look at the animal world, what animal is ugly on the inside?
Well, they successfully deported you (or your ascendants), so you (or your ascendants) obeyed their orders, and so implicitly accepted their authority.  More over, from your previous comments, it seems that you are a felow french citizen who also emigrated to Canada, as such, you have agreed to follow the system that is currently in place.
&gt; I'm not saying the Hijab in and of itself is always oppressive.... And the interpretation that both [the hijab and the swatika] are symbols of oppression are not unfounded.  So let me get this straight. Your argument is that the hijab is not oppressive, but the idea that the hijab is oppressive is not unfounded. Those two statements contradict each other.  Sorry, but I don't come here to argue with idiots like you who dress up their racism with caveats.
The guy gives his daughter herpes. After ten minutes of prayer, everything's swell! And remember, watching porn inevitably causes you to rape toddlers.  This one is so embarrassing that Chick Publications has been trying to get rid of it and hope everybody forgets about it. Fortunately, it's hard to make information disappear from the Internet.
To me, the sounds from that game are definitively the best in an FPS game ever.  So simple, yet so perfect.
No way man. It's not like a website called middle-east-online.com could have any anti-American bias...
Francine Dee is 3/4 filipina 1/4 chinese ... next time do a little research (btw her face is clearly filipina for those experienced in Asian girls)
MONZY [kill -9](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fow7iUaKrq4)
You forgot to take of your glasses...
I'd buy you some art, like a Picasso or a Garfunkel
Welcome...90% of my friends are only they weren't artificially inseminated to be made.
Nope. Otherwise your first triple-digit number is pronounced "thirty-six" rather than "one hundred". We can't have that because it wouldn't make any sense, except in base X (Roman numeral).
Hey there! Welcome to our world. I sincerely hope you enjoy your time.
Consider me raised.
My apologies for the misunderstanding then.
Zing!
You can lead a horse to water and have him drowned.
In a fucking heartbeat.
No.  This one took me the longest too.  The owls indicate the position of the apple in the tree.
Just uploaded two tracks.  Hope I did it right, I'm a little retarded with technology these days.
I think you just have an *inferiority* complex.
Is this where the dickhead competitions are being held? 
&gt;Maybe. I am operating on prejudices here, but I don't think a woman would find an emotionally distant man as attractive, especially since they value emotions so much.  haha unfortunately we all can't seem to get enough of emotionally distant men.  and basically i got turned on reading the OP haha, the idea of someone living in such a calculated manner really appeals to me.  i think if you were pretty honest about yourself you actually have a chance at attracting a pretty high caliber of women (i guess that depends on your definition of high caliber though).  i could see there being some pretty cool chicks that would dig you for it, as long as you were willingly revealing all of this to them.  edit: i want to add that we don't all live in a world of love, emotions, babies and rainbows.  some women feel extremely stifled by all of the feminine stereotypes that we have to live up to and as such could probably relate to the idea of 'putting on a show'.  so yes, many women won't be able to handle you, but there are some that would actually really really like you for being honest and open about something that maybe they recognize in themselves too.  good luck.
How about Country Club or Big Bear? If you're gonna be ghetto, be really ghetto
Now that you're here, just a few pointers:  Pass to the left  Don't hog the joint/bowl/bong/whatever. It's not a microphone  Learn to roll by hand before buying a joint roller  Don't use weed as an excuse to be lazy  Try not to let your dealer pre-weigh stuff  Don't buy on credit  Don't get caught  Other than that, be safe, be responsible, and enjoy! :)
&gt;Yes he is, I have His Holy T-Shirt to prove it.  Fuhtafy'd.  Edit: FTFY. I think fuhtafy would be how to pronounce it. Either that or "fitfee". How would you pronounce it?
Halloween isn't just like Christmas, but geeks know that Oct 31 = Dec 25.
yeah you are right about that. It's disgusting that she wasn't helped long before it came to it. 13 year old prostitutes? What were the police up to? I am not in anyway excusing the taking of a human life. It's wrong to murder, of course it is. But it's also wrong for a society to fail to protect a child from abuse and then lock her away for life with no chance of parole when she acts in a way that the abuse almost certainly caused. Especially since she was a 16 year old child at the time. The fact that she asked the judge means fuck all because she was a CHILD. 
Heavy Rain isn't really an RPG though.
frogking is absolutely correct. I went through college and students didn't even know how to use headers and footers -- they were manually entering each page number. There's no way that abiword or openoffice.org wouldn't be sufficient for a 15 year old.
who wants to help make this?
aw did i offend the atheists, my bad!
Very suspect decision by the judge which is appealable, and, frankly, a winnable case for Mr. Taylor.  When you waive your rights, you waive them. Not for a minute, not for a day, not for twenty years.  Forever.  This is an incorrect decision by the judge, not just from a common-sense standpoint, but from a legal standpoint.
man, I wish I lived in a place where the majority of street people were merely alcoholics.  What an innocent time that was!
You must not pierce them in a boat  You should not stab them in a moat!  I like the little birds, you see,  and bears and moles and manatees.  So nawhal, please, I beg of you  do not run our fine friends through!  I beseech you, nay, I even pray  let them live another day!
Cool, just got the book and finished it. Mmm soy sauce. 
The reason there are Linux versions of both Avast and ClamAV is because sometimes it makes sense to clean up a drive on a machine that can't be infected by what is infecting the drive. I know Windows is a *decent* OS, but I wouldn't call it a "good" one. You can't throw a factor as large as its "affinity to vulnerabilities" aside when considering the kind of experience it gives overall. I've worked in computer repair and I can tell you that many people's idea of Windows after using nothing but Windows is that it's less than good. All they see is the Swiss cheese array of holes that has turned their once fast and still expensive computer into a slow, chugging piece of junk that's going to cost them near $100 to fix.   Similar things can be said for Linux, though. People get frustrated trying to deal with the command line for the first time when their sound doesn't work. Others give up when they can't adjust their screen resolution. Perhaps I should have prefaced this with saying I'm not content with any modern operating system. Each one has its holes in security or user experience or interoperability or not randomly deleting user data. My point, however, that Windows is not a "good" OS stands, though. If you grade everything on a curve, it's OK to be overweight in the US.
a big hdtv is not in the budget, unfortunately. and it is my understanding that there are ways to do what i want in windows (itunes and others do it, i think. i've never used them.).
Do you have any good starting point resources for Haskell? Maybe I'll try to get into it over the weekend.
Ross enjoys getting Walken to do this sort of thing. [Here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2vNk4K3YaIc) he gets him to read the Three Little Pigs.  Unfortunately, lost to time is Sir Ian McKellen reading Like A Virgin for Comic Relief.
&gt;Your statement here, for example, assumes that the only reason the system isn't working is because people aren't taking enough advantage of the free market. You ignore/forget the other forces acting on peoples' decisions. You ignore about as much hard reality as a teenage Marxist.  "free market idealism" would mean no interference from government. I've never advocated that, ever. Government's only *moral* function is to protect its citizens against force and fraud. That includes protecting us against corporations that would use fraud and force.   I identified myself as a "sharecropper" only insofar as the government *demands* a greater percentage of my salary than did the landowners. Everything else is simply your conjecture. I like how you got yourself all righteously riled up tho.  Of course Socialists have wealth and huge organizations. They just happen to own the corporations also. Are you really telling me that centers of power and influence do *not* arise in a Socialist system?  And I'm getting rather tired of you putting words in my mouth. If you want to bash at strawmen, you can surely find others to engage you. I *never* said that no outside influences can act on a person's life. But how many times in your life, honestly, has something bad happened to you *completely out of the blue*. I'm willing to bet that at least 95% of the time, you were at least a *party* to it, either through bad decisions, or not making a decision.  Funny, I advocate freedom. I hope you wear your chains lightly.  Edit: Punctuation.
I hear they don't like foxholes either.
For fucks sakes, its like this sub-reddit is full of nothing but noobs. How did this make it to my front page.  Newsflash people, cannabis is the most popular drug around today, excluding caffeine, ciggs and alcohol, so bragging about being such a noob is annoying to us people who actually don't give a fuck if you just started smoking weed. Contribute or GTFO, don't make us change your diaper, powder your ass and rock you to sleep.
**YOU ARE TITTIES! GO AND ENJOY LIFE!**
reddit
I really don't give a shit about entertainers' opinions of vaccination. Really.
well said
Oh wow, ripped off from a current thread, you suck.
That's weak. I hate buying fucking kegs for people. If it's not something like this, it's SOMETHING. As far as what I'd do to avoid legal liability, try to get the message across to Chris that first, he's an idiot, and second that he is putting you in legal jeopardy and now must take responsibility for his actions in the case that he does get in trouble by saying he just took it from the party. Getting this message to them may prove to be impossible, and in the case that it is impossible to get a hold of them and they get in trouble and the police come a'knocking- don't speak to them any more than you must in order to tell them you would like to speak to your lawyer.
Prove your love.  Get a sex change operation.
[Comb](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p3hdytcAUjI) your hair.
FUCK NO.  First of all, I don't understand this whole Mary-Jay movement anyway.  What is so freakin compelling about Marijuana?  I've tried it.  It makes me paranoid and hungry.  I am baffled that people are so freakin' rabid about it.  Second, it hurts to inhale it.  It burns my throat, and if it doesn't burn your throat, it's because you've damaged the lining of it.
no no he's not a friend, he's one of my least favorite people on the planet. HIV hasn't figured out a way to end his life, so i want that policy to continue.
Don't forget to give a brief mention to the reptilians.
the rum factory
Nope, I live near Anoka, MN...the Halloween Capital of the world.
How could you not?
Cover yourself in jelly and masturbate to the rules of grammar.
panthera  x silla de ruedas 
Unfortunately, there are a lot of very stupid sociopaths in high positions at schools and school boards.
Yep, Brighton huh? I occasionally go to basement parties at hooker st. in Allston.
[Shake Yr Dix](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=walFnlseA9Q)
I like to have an open mind about Geocentrism and the very strong theory of Celestial Orbs.
But that's not a theory ... that's a myth. There are English TEKs for mythology and folklore under which this type of instruction could take place:  &gt;(7) Reading/Comprehension of Literary Text/Sensory Language. Students understand, make inferences and draw conclusions about how an author's sensory language creates imagery in literary text and provide evidence from text to support their understanding. Students are expected to analyze the meaning of classical, mythological, and biblical allusions in words, phrases, passages, and literary works.  &gt;(11) Reading/literary concepts. The student analyzes literary elements for their contributions to meaning in literary texts. The student is expected to: (H) understand literary forms and terms such as author, drama, biography, autobiography, myth, tall tale, dialogue, tragedy and comedy, structure in poetry, epic, ballad, protagonist, antagonist, paradox, analogy, dialect, and comic relief as appropriate to the selections being read.
Agreed. Offended: no.  Annoyed that the statements are misused to promote the false argument of a "Christian" nation: **yes.**   edit: "a" 
Great answer, though I think others reading your answer should look further into what Mini DisplayPort is (e.g., follows a VESA specification) before spitting out the Kool Aid they just drank.  [http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mini_DisplayPort](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mini_DisplayPort)  {edited for clarity}
4 track mini disc recorder
The Maxx should be out on DVD by 2050.
Whoa, what a deep thought;  Can't get off unless you cough,  So it is I've heard.
Do you have a schizoid "hero"? The book World War Z has a couple of quasi-protagonists with related conditions, but I can't think of too many positive examples elsewhere. 
A favorite "story" happened before the current owner bought the Cay.  My wife and I had been "babysitting" the Cay, in the hopes of 1) having a one-on-one with anyone that's in the Island Market, and perhaps being hired by them on whatever Cay they eventually buy, or 2) being "sold" with the Cay.  We had been doing this for about two years, slowly working through our financial reserves.  We were sitting at the dining room table one afternoon.  To the East, was the island we left a few years prior.  To the West, was a small, beautiful island.  This little tiny Cay has an enormous sand bar that stretches far out, about three miles, to the south west.  It's about two miles west of us.  We saw some activity on the Cay, and through the binoculars, noticed that anOTHER Haitian sailboat, LOADED with "refugees", had gotten caught in the sandy hook of the bar.  The local constabulary was already in response.  I'd been on three of these "rescue" missions.  Heart Wrenching.  As we observed, we noticed a large amphibian aircraft, I think it was a Grumman Mallard or Goose, come in low from the west, directly over us, and proceed to the island we used to work at.  Turned the binocs there, to observe the Owners daughter, family, and entourage deplaning for their "vacation".  Billionaires daughter.  Entire Cay staff on the beach, in their matching uniforms.  We were spiritually, economically, and physically smack-dab in the MIDDLE of the two extremes of human condition, happening simultaneously.  Was profound, and gave us a much-needed boost of gratitude. Edit:  I told that story to the current owner.  Said, with my permission, it may end up in a scene some day.  Granted.  So, if you ever see that depicted, you'll know the back story.  
How's your diet?
wow, that really puts a new light on your username
I was talking to this guy about a girl I had been seeing for a few months prior. The conversation deviated(by me) from how fun she was to how much she liked it when I was oral with her, and how she liked having her asshole eaten.  It was her brother, there for her birthday.
That sounds good.
it's a braiding machine but with a torus instead of a circle
Type emf scam into Google.
working for me?hmm
Yeah. While I agree with the author, he didn't seem to give any reasons for the why. All he really said was, "The people want change so eventually legislators will have to answer them."
1-Day Fun Pass Cost: $8.25, reduced fare not available Good for unlimited subway and local bus rides from first use until 3 a.m. the following day. Sold at MetroCard Vending Machines and at neighborhood stores. Not available at station booths. 
She should have gone to the police, so they could have charged her with sex crimes and gotten her convicted and registered as a sex offender for the rest of her life.  That would have been justice.
andrew eldritch, singer for the Sisters of Mercy
Your life sucks.
He must have written this essay: http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/9xqby/an_essay_i_found_on_the_floor_at_my_local/
^ This
The 4cm "difference" is well within the adjustment available for swapping stems or seatposts.  All your bikes are within 40mm.  Near enough to the exact same size.  In fact, mountain bikes frames come in increments of 50mm -- ie., the smallest meaningful size 'difference' is more like 2 inches.  Most cyclocross frames are typically longer on the top tube than road frames if you read the **geometry chart** as I was saying.  You've probably got three frames with almost the exact same top tube length.  The nominal size you're referring to only refers to the seat tube, which is essentially irrelevant as the seat post adjusts this fit.  The *reach* is the real size of the bike.
...hehe
Frank: This is going to be exactly like Woodstock.   Dee: Oh, is it? Ooh, are you planning on getting yourself locked in the bathroom of your cousin's Winnebago for 3 days?   Frank: Shut up about that! I survived on hand soap and toilet water for three days. The memory haunts me.
Maybe they feel sorry for you...
You've just embiggened my mind.
thank you for the $8 vodka! 
Sounds cruel. But personally, I'd prefer 1/2 hour to 1 year. But that's just me.
At the same time, I believe we should refocus on 'magnitude of accomplishment' as we age. Between the ages of 22 (graduating w/ a bachelor) and your death, what the hell else are you going to do with your time?  Emotions are fleeting. Building something of value, while fleeting in the 'all good things must come to an end' perspective, is more important than how you feel about your life.
Putting "power" over the optical channel would be pretty amusing.  It might require a quad laser.
Seriously, we should meet up. Where are you based?
Fatino.
^^ This.
So what draws the line between needed and unneeded government?  If government can play a positive role in law and police, why not have it take on other roles? 
Sweet.  The post initially went down to 0 points (maybe a bot, I dunno) and I cried softly to myself.
dvd player != movies  (unless i am misunderstanding)
You should read "Super Thief" by Jack Maclean, a former thief who made millions by stealing only from the rich. It is an insight for people who wish to prevent burglary. He surveyed hundreds of burglars in prison, and come up with the best preventative methods. He calls them 'mind games' and its pretty much a 3 step process;  * Remove all invitations, anything that says your place is easy, you don't want people to know you aren't home, you don't want people to think it is easy to get in (or help them with tools left out), and you don't want people to think your place has stuff worth stealing. * Make them think it is dangerous to enter and they will have a hard time getting out alive. His examples are writing notes about dangerous animals being inside, making them think you have dogs (even if you don't) and stuff like that * Curb the thieves profit gain by not putting shit in expectable places. First place people check is the master bedroom, usually the ladies dresser drawers for jewelry. Next is cabinets and other drawers.   "Secrets of a Super Thief" by John MacLean, has lots of great info on the subject. Has some funny stories too, like him leaving a note on a police car after robbing the neighbor. 
wasn't, but now that you mention it, i should fill it up with alcohol before i leave
Have you tried simply turning off the TV, sitting down with your roommates, and hitting them?
Because a vote for either lends legitimacy to both. It's a message that says "The system is working! I was offered a choice and I took it and I'm happy! I've surrendered my will to the democratic process and now I'll suffer whichever of these complete bastards gets elected without complaint." It's a complete capitulation to the status quo.
I primarily meant to link to my revelation here: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Grimace_%28character%29#Characters  "Grimace is an anthropomorphic purple tastebud. Initially, Grimace was the "Evil Grimace", with two pairs of arms with which to steal milkshakes. After that first campaign, the character was revised to be one of the "good guys", and his number of arms was reduced by two."  Alas, I fucked up. Apologies.
no u are
You must have been thinkin': HOW HAS NO ONE SAID THIS YET!? I'M SO LUCKY!!  "Fools rush in..." 
Fair enough. Thanks for the response.
famous picture of the sun? please tell me where you got it, i'd like to know about the original a little bit more?  all you did is just invert the colors?  what spectrum is the image taken at? 
^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^This.
It's accurate insofar a collection of exclusively negative facts could be put together about any programming language.  I understand a few boring positive facts can't have the same appeal as the denouncement of a scandalous situation, but let me say this. Walter Bright, Don Clugston, Sean Kelly, and myself are doing, I think, a good job at finalizing D2. My book The D Programming Language, which is planned to be published together with D2 itself, has 319 pages out of the planned 380. (An entire chapter is available and has been discussed in [this forum](http://www.reddit.com/r/programming/comments/9z41o/andrei_alexandrescus_book_about_the_d_programming/), and real-time status can be found on my [homepage](http://erdani.com).) Don and Walter have improved the quality of the compiler by leaps and bounds - the difference is very visible since only a few months ago. Things that simply couldn't be done (due to specification incompleteness or just bugs in the compiler) can now be achieved trivially. Don is to be credited for a very successful (and nearly complete now) quest of eliminating _all_ dreaded Internal Compiler Errors, and Walter is busy with adding the last feature bits. I am versed in a fair share of languages and I can say D has abilities that make it very powerful and enjoyable to use.  I'm pretty sure someone will point this out, so in the interest of completeness: Jarrett has since left the D newsgroup, at least in part because he finds my character insufferable. Following [this](http://www.digitalmars.com/webnews/newsgroups.php?art_group=digitalmars.D&amp;article_id=97984) post of mine, he decided to leave and explained his reasons [here](http://www.digitalmars.com/d/archives/digitalmars/D/Goodbye_97993.html). His outrage was based on a misunderstanding, as I tried to explain in that thread.
Marriage is a legally binding agreement that gives life partners certain privilege &amp; responsibilities for the generational favor of caesar.
I'm a writer, too.  You are correct.  There is no question it is fiction. 
But c'mon...everyone's talking about a new world economic order every week lately. You don't think the most influential people in the world have a common agenda that may or may not be hidden from the public?
***YEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!***
Just don't buy her any presents for holidays/birthday for like, 3 years.
http://www.fourmilab.ch/cship/lorentz.html
Grab a laptopIDE-&gt;desktopIDE adapter for 5 bucks off of newegg.com, drop the HDD in an enclosure and plug it into another computer to snag your files.
In a certain sense, saying "I'll do and act as I please, and if it happens to line up with the Catholic paradigm, so be it" is Catholic dogma.  If somebody's conscience dictates something, especially on a matter within the purview of religion, somebody is obligated to follow that dictate otherwise people are just doing good because they are "supposed to" which Paul speaks against repeatedly in the Letter to the Romans.  http://www.vatican.va/archive/catechism/p3s1c1a6.htm  The background of this page is tough on the eyes, but the copy/paste came out formatted weird.
Hey, it's suppose to be a nice day tomorrow. How about we go golfing. The ladies tell me I'm long off the tee. And if we get a chance to play the back nine, I promise to be gentle and take it slow. Although I can be rather passionate if necessary. I've been known to chew up a few greens. And if you don't have any golf equipment, don't worry. I have a few golf balls you can play with.
It *was* another Duke Nukem Forever, having been in development some 9 years before being finally released in 2007.
Someone should tell your President.
I absolutely agree. Imagine if you could *always* have casual sex anytime you feel like it with any number of people. Well, that's what it's like being a woman. *And you're telling me they're never going to cheat?* You gotta either be stupid or delusional or both. Might as well believe in God too.   Unless she's completely unattractive, every woman will cheat given enough time.
Calculus. At least one semester of differential equations. Physics, general chemisty, organic chemistry, biology, anatomy and physiology. No matter what your major, being scientifically literate is a plus in life. I think some computer programming would also help.
I'm sure there are some, but as a rule I would wager that they don't.  If you have testable, verifiable, and repeatable evidence that runs contrary to evolution I think that once you submit your ideas to the scrutiny of the experts in the field I feel that they would whole heatedly accept your new evidence and any implications that may arise due to it.
&gt; f I go to another country, I have to abide by their rules. Why is it not the other way around? (foxnews.com)  Um... where in that article does it say that Zaki is in "another country"?  Oh, I see where you're coming from: she's brown and Muslim, so she can't be a real American, is that it?
[citation needed]
Aaagh, the last word is cut )x
I hate it a lot more when firefox decides to adopt a different favicon. My igoogle bookmark usually doesn't have the logo for google, but rather one for wasted talent, a webcomic. I don't know why it picks that one in particular. 
What gets you really high, is when your holding in a hit, or just after, force the blood to your head. That's all coughing does.
I'm sick of this infernal blasphemy against His Holiness, redditors. He didn't create you, the mountains, the trees, and the midgit in his image for you to curse his name. I've had enough of this, I'm leaving reddit to pray for you all to blessed by His Noodly Appendage.
So the gaming companies haven't like, you know, donated gaming equipment?  Something that doesn't cut into their sales - like big monitors... or networking equipment? 
Quit smoking shit weed.  Go to a place that has a nice selection of good weed like Amsterdam.  Good weed does not smell like shit.
Nonsense. It's angels sitting on them.
Well, I firmly believe that violence should only be used as a means of self-defense. I do believe that offensive violence can be justified as self-defense, but it depends on on quite a few things.   I can certainly understand why you you believe that that any violence against the State can be legitimatized, but I haven't made up my mind on if I agree or not.   Basically, other avenues should be considered and explored in my mind. Or at least simultaneously. 
I walked through one of these at burbank airport. It didn't catch the rolled up in a ziploc-bag stash of contra-band herb that i had in my panties. It was kind invasive though. This TSA woman directed me into this circular-phone-booth-type thing, told me to stand on marked spots on the floor (feet spread past shoulders) and put my arms up and outretched. Then, this camera-light-thing swirled around me. She stopped me by putting her hand up and didn't let me leave the booth thing until this TSA man, who is sitting in front of a computer a foot awat, gives her the go-ahead. Creeped me out a bit.
If *I* saw Stephen Sackur coming to interview *me* I'd run a mile, and I don't have anything (much) to hide.  He's the interviewer equivalent of a marine drill sergeant.
THANK YOU!!! I saw that same article about a month ago and said the same thing but nobody listened ...  If it was pure self defense (say she pushed him off a ledge accidentally ... in a struggle), I'm sure her lawyers would have had that information front and center in that video ... but I find it creepy that they are completely silent about how she killed the prick. 
I've decided after reading some reviews, I'm going to buy the game anyway no matter what...
Hell, yes!  On the off chance that you're in [New York](http://redbox.wikidot.com/) or [Vancouver](http://redvan.wikidot.com/) you're in luck--drop by the forums and get in a game!
&gt;it was a legitimate and authentic work created from scratch Considering an actual soldier says the movie is full of crap, I doubt this movie is legitimate and authentic.
OMG that was awesome.
My favorite part was that his code was uglier and harder for me to read than the example openssl code he posted. Beauty is in the eye of the beholder it seems.
&gt;it would be nice for someone to have either a rejection notice when they're posting to a /r/ they're banned from, or a message at ban-time that their ability to post to that /r/ has been cut off.  I figured my suggestion allowed for that.  If the spam filter is about to eat it, warn the submitter.  Let them know that the spam filter has learned *or* been told  +the source site is spammy.  +the title matches spammy characteristics  +the specific user has been banned from that /r/  Or even no specifics; which would allow someone subject to the filter to learn how to evade it, but still let someone know their post will be caught by the spam filter and won't be published / they should contact a mod to appeal it's up-published-ness.  
was at 666 upvotes when i read this
"One estimate of Cannabis's LD50 (the dose required to kill half the members of a tested population) for humans indicates that about 1500 pounds (680 kilograms) of Cannabis would have to be smoked within 15 minutes."  I've tried, it cannot be done! :P
BWAHHHHAHHAHHA!  You were hitting on a gay guy and he didn't play it off!
Since when did cops help whores?  She would have ended up gang-raped and returned to her master for the usual finder's fee.  If cops gave a shit they'd pick these girls up and turn them over to Child Protective Services.  Doesn't happen.
:(  This is how the herd sifts out the weak. 
Why isn't time stepwise?  What time is it? 4:00pm. Oh wait. Now it's 5:00pm.
tom tromey is a legend.
Holy fuck. How did they get a third half into one whole?
thanks for the tip. that's not a great selection, though.
If a woman doesn't want to swallow, no one should be "convincing" her to do so. Also the reasons given are really not persuasive at all - "It's got vitamins!" what the hell is that?
I have one more left to give away. I like funny stories. Best story/joke gets it. 
Yes, yes it is.  Management simply do not understand what the development process entails, so they attempt to manage it like some wayward vendor: a mixture of micro-managing targets and divide-and-conquer tactics.  The only exception to this would be if you were lucky enough to have managers with some brains.  (I was going to say managers with technical experience, but sometimes these people make the worst kinds of micro-managers; plus there are some freakish non-technical managers who do understand laws of causality, and are on our side, but they're damned rare.)
I'm always surprised by how few people dislike Mitch' stand-up, because I always imagined his unique style would put some people off. I crack up even just reading some of his lines, and I wonder if they're funny because I imagine Mitch saying them, or also just because they're funny in themselves.  Either way, if you can get past the fact that there's absolutely no narrative to his jokes, you'll probably like his stuff if you listen to a bit more of it. Just the one-liners in this documentary don't do his stuff justice, because part of the fun is the constant barrage of them and that they are almost all funny.
i was born in japan, and live in canada now, but i have visited many a nation, especially 3rd world nations as i hold an indian passport.
Upvoted for **truth.**  Read my post on this same thread. We both noted that the "War on Terror" is ironic.   Btw, I'm American, and though I will be probably be joining the Marine Corp as an officer, I do not support the war, I do not support the invasion of other countries when it conflicts with our own materialistic interests in the guise of freedom ([1953 Iranian Coup D'Etat](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1953_Iranian_coup_d'%C3%A9tat) ring a bell in anyone's mind? Who overthrew the democratically elected Prime Minister of Iran and installed a corrupt/dictatorial monarchy instead which inevitably led to the current religious fanatic regime that is in Iran today?).  http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9zpqx/soldiers_who_have_been_in_battle_do_you_like/c0f6o8n
I would go with something that mimics the recycling motto "Reduce, Reuse, Recycle"... maybe "Seduce, Abuse,.... (hard to find something that rhymes with "recycle")
Orange county, California, also has a lot of religious 'alternatives' to traditional Halloween.  I'm rather glad, because I don't like people knocking on my door.
I can tell you that Afghan guys, some of whom have, and some of whom have not been in combat enjoy playing COD4 a lot.  Particularly the part with shooting Russians.
In what decade did you grow up?
My Dad had to Dewy Decimal his library.  It was cool, I thought.  So I understand your excitement.  Carry on.
What things do you miss from living on the mainland?
It's already here. I saw it in a bodega in Mexico City.
Yeah it was modded. 1.6 with a liteon drive... People were claiming that playing madden 2010 caused it but no game other than cod wow has been in my xbox since june...
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Methanol
&lt;a href="http://www.commentbuddy.com"&gt;MySpace Graphics&lt;/a&gt;&lt;br&gt;&lt;a href="http://www.commentbuddy.com"&gt;&lt;img border="0" src="http://www.pimp123.com/comments/Funny/DUCKY.jpg"&gt;&lt;/a&gt;&lt;br&gt;&lt;a href="http://www.commentbuddy.com/"&gt;CommentBuddy&lt;/a&gt;&lt;/a&gt;
You're welcome.  To elaborate a little bit more, I'd describe heroin's taste as flowery. Other people would describe it as tasting like acetic anhydride, a precursor used to make heroin. Not sure where they have tasted that before. I guess it's subjective.
Amazing!
they are probably out enjoying a night of Halloween strippers
Maybe Reddit should do the same thing for Christmas. Let's all agree to have Christmas on November 8th.
should have used  fix-point integers*!*
&gt;I was born in a non-Muslim family and my parents were ex-hippies back in the seventies  Wow, I think that needs some more explaination there. Are you ethnically Iranian? How many people are non-muslim there, and can they admit that in public?
pfft....  AOL voice :)
you missed my point completely so let me put this right here nice and easy for you to access.   -- http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9zqp5/death_penalty_world_map_pic/  sge_fan 8 points  2 hours ago*  You have great company, USA. Zimbabwe, China, Sudan, Saudi-Arabia, Belarus, Burma, Iran, Cuba. True pillars of human rights. I guess you can't expect more from a country that tortures.
 Arizona has one of the highest (if not the highest) prison recidivism rate in the country. Maybe if the police stopped arresting Mexicans for being mexicans, some of which are tax payers and people who are doing honest work, and started arresting drug dealers and the people who run the meth labs something would be different. Note how everything gets worse and worse and Arpaio is voted in again and again.
Wow - deja vu. Exact thing happened to me about 6 years ago in Waterloo, Ontario. Just took money out of the bank machine, and a white van pulled up being driven by a dolphin and a whale.  They convinced me to buy the speakers, and ever since that day I hate all dolphins and whales, and will not rest until they are all dead! Fuck you, Fuck you dolphin and whale!!!
hated the board game version.
Troll YouTube commenters. 
As weird as it sounds it was to disassociate from Fahrenheit 911.
I just smoked for the first time today as well while i read your story It gave me the courage to try smoking today   granted I still have smoked everyday for quite some time now, I just woke up
That happens to me all the time; I'll see something and think "that's so fake, who'd ever think it wasn't cg" then I look at the behind the scenes and realise it was a robot or something.
I put this in my .bashrc   alias :e=vim  alias :q=exit  Tab completion is the #1 most useful aide.   " This function determines, whether we are on the start of the line text (then tab indents) or if we want to try autocompletion  function InsertTabWrapper()   let col = col('.') - 1   if !col || getline('.')[col - 1] !~ '\k'    return "\&lt;tab&gt;"   else    return "\&lt;c-p&gt;"   endif  endfunction  " Remap the tab key to select action with InsertTabWrapper  inoremap &lt;tab&gt; &lt;c-r&gt;=InsertTabWrapper()&lt;cr&gt;
